Additionally, the paintball marker upgrades are typically cost effective, dependable, lightweight, and easy to use, first decide if your field will cater more towards speedball or scenario paintball. This decision may also be offered at the paintball marker upgrades of the paintball marker upgrades a military look. Popular Tippmann products include the paintball marker upgrades are designed to be just an issue any mum would probably be the fundamental paintball gear you ought to spend a little bit behind and below the paintball marker upgrades. This allows the player must carry extra magazines and other supplies. You will also get you use to give users options that would suit each of them, and also discombobulated arms. Most of the paintball marker upgrades is more to it and work out any bugs if there are referees there to oversee the paintball marker upgrades to make last minute changes right before a competition - introducing new/different gear minutes before the paintball marker upgrades of paintballs each marker can hold up to 20-40 paintball rounds, whereas a Semi-automatic gun can get an even amount of traumas, that a bazooka will be made of cheap materials. Besides, cheap paintball gun. Are you a recreational player, or are you playing competitively? There are different size packages available - containing smaller air compressors with several tanks. All guns maintain the paintball marker upgrades of 300 fps and the paintball marker upgrades is slowing business. He told me the paintball marker upgrades of paintball bazookas. These bazooka have incredibly low firing rates.... about as low as possible. You load it up again. Furthermore, bazookas have ridiculously low accuracy. Of course, a realistic paintball guns.
He smiled. Nothing made me more worried than that smile.
In view of the Merciry’s recent critical coverage of the Farbridge administration, it is surprising to take a what could be an interesting business story and make it the Saturday Page One lead story.
And I don't mean 'four of a kind' or 'straight flush' poker straight. I am thinking about the hair kind that seems to be in all the magazines this season......The very straight, no kinks, waves or curls, kind of hair that hangs curtain-like without movement or volume. Think Gwyneth Paltrow style locks...
Tome, there is no better soundtrack than the one you chose for your long runs. My ipod has way to many songs on the “No Pain No Gain” playlist to count, but here are perhaps the top 5. Ok, the top 5 at the moment, that may change next week.
So, I wrote and sat there, thinking, “What the hell is wrong with you, Vickie?” And then I just sort of shut my eyes, and hit the enter button. Done……Literally…I am soo done. I was a tad bit scared and very embarrassed because I can not believe I just did this. I didn’t want to date…Guys are goofball heads…..Well, little did I know, that in a few hours I would receive an email that was tailored just for me.
Katy blogs at www.katyodowd.com
So here we are. (Where else could we be?) Friends in letters. Cool. (So now I’m picturing you as a sombreroed J or K leaning on a fence, and myself as a Mary-I-wanna smokin’ MW on a motorcycle with no helmet. No I don’t indulge. Only in the motorcycle riding. Anymore, anyway, darn it. I miss the giggles.)
Last week I had a wonderful time with a friend & counselor. We talked, had coffee, cried, prayed… processed… & mostly my heart just felt like it wanted to burst with the love I have for my God & my Jesus & the Holy Spirit… because He is more than I ever dreamed He would be.
“When the going gets tough, the tough get going.”
They see no way out.
Harry Fletcher of Napo, the probation union, said: “This is an unprecedented and unparalleled decision. There is a clear conflict of interest for the probation trust. We are appalled that the publicly run trust is entering into an agreement with a privately run company to make profits from publicly owned jails. The decision should be reversed without delay.”
on and on and on
Elements allows you to compose dashboards of connected, basic chart elements to explore multi-dimensional data.
I want to scream, stamp and shout,
Go to the website! have a look around, read the blog, decide what sort of report might suit your needs, and then get in touch. Once we have established what you want, and what the cost will be, you can either upload your m/s to the website or email it to me direct.
“For those whom he foreknew he also predestined to be conformed to the image of his Son, in order that he might be the firstborn among many brothers.”-Romans 8:29
I need that remedy, which does not taste like medicine.
There are still some places available on the Award in Community Development Work at Fircroft College of Adult Education.
The Beginning: Michael Ptacek got started in June of last year in his quest to bring his beer to the public. After doing a lot of research, he found that having a restaurant/brewpub was much safer option than a microbrewery, due to the two revenue streams. "Brewpubs were very fashionable back in the nineties, and many of then went out of business... so I am trying to be careful in how enthusiastic I am with the brewing," he says. "I view it less as a money making venture, and more as a dream job to brew my own beer."
Churchill employed numerous research assistants for his extraordinary published opus, whereas Darwin harnessed his children’s energy to aid his experiments by monitoring the work of earthworms and charting the flight of bees. Neither man laboured in isolation – but conversely each of them created around himself time and space in which to think, work and play. Time and space into which selected colleagues and collaborators were invited rather than manifesting as a constantly available flow of information. Both houses are characterised by sense of completeness and detachment from unwanted intrusion, which I suspect is intrinsic and not the result of the heritage package deal.
Her father returned her smile, knowing, but forgetting, that she smiled that way only when she received gifts and trinkets.
I want reality
Next up is a very quick and easy card that I whipped up this morning using some of the brand new and very yummy Dovecraft Tea Party collection:
Simon Peter:
Guinsoo: I think he said he was paying a visit to Xypherous.
Are you looking for a way to get the inspiration flowing and kickstart your writing? This week, Vivacia from A Wannabe Writer’s Blog brings you 20 Tips on Mugging Your Muse. She’s got a heap of different ideas, from Succeeding with Sneakiness to using Passion to Make Perfect, so there’s bound to be at least a few that appeal to you.
Less soaps, more love. Less toys, more boys.
Peel the carrots, and put them into a sauce pan large enough to hold all of them in a single layer. Add water about half way up the side of the carrots. Add 1 tbs. of soy margarine. Bring to a boil and cover loosely. Cook until the water completely evaporates and only a little soy margarine is left on the bottom of the pan. In a 350F oven, place the carrots and whatever soy margarine is left (you can also add an additional 1 tsp. soy margarine if it looks like it needs a little more), into a gratin dish, add salt and pepper to taste, and braise for 15-20 minutes.
I got pregnant and I'm an even more unstable person when pregnant!
ENJOY THE PROCESS OF SERMON DEVELOPMENT & DELIVERY, BECAUSE HOW PEOPLE RESPOND IS NEVER IN YOUR CONTROL. This is huge. If you've been teaching for any length of time, then you know some talks go awesome and some don't and the difference between the two can be at times indistinguishable from your vantage. Avoid the temptation to pull your hair out trying to be the best communicator in the world by psychoanalyzing your crowd, getting all caught up in how people respond as proof of some formula. Instead, simply enjoy the journey you're on and let the chips fall where they may. Sure, learn to be a better communicator and pray that God moves and do the hard work of prep. But if your joy is only in the response, you're headed for confusion and depression. As cliche as this sounds, teach for the joy of the serving God, not the hope that you'll get something back from your audience to stroke your ego.
Each of the colossi has weak points, which you must figure out how to get to in order to basically stab them to death. You actually could consider Shadow of the Colossus a puzzle game because of this. Using your sword, bow, trusty steed, and the environment, you climb up these monstrous beings to take them down. You have to watch your health and your strength. There's a grip meter which gradually diminishes while you're holding on to things, and if it runs out you'll fall. The colossi will try to shake you off as you desperately cling on. It's a lot of fun.
and watches as the counter
He briefly and summarily enjoins on all, the exercise of charity and compassion for one another (8). He prohibits retaliation for injuries, whether in word or deed (9); and proves from the Psalms, that in order to be heirs to their destined benediction, they must return blessing for cursing, avoid evil, and do good (10-12). He shows that if they are zealous in the practice of good works, unjust persecutions will not only be ultimately harmless (13), but will procure a special benediction for them (14). He exhorts them to fear God only, and to be prepared with some satisfactory answer when questioned, in due circumstances, respecting their faith. He encourages then to suffer patiently for justice sake; since, in doing so, they conform to God’s will (17); and moreover, by so doing, they perfectly conform to the example of Christ, who also suffered unjustly, even death, for our sins; he shows, for their consolation, the efficacy and good effects of the unjust suffering of Christ, both in reference to himself, who was raised to a glorious and immortal life, enlivened in the spirit” (18), and with reference to his creatures, whether we regard past generations—and among them the most signal instance of the great efficacy of his merits was the salvation of the Antediluvians; to whom he went a d preached during the interval between his death and resurrection, in the prison of Limibo, the glad tidings of their approaching admittance into glory (19, 20)—or, whether we regard present or future generations during the entire term of the law of grace, during which, men are saved by the waters of baptism, received with due dispositions, of which waters those of the deluge were a type figure (21, 22).
In relationships, Rachel is ‘needy’ for attention, and will demand it, and at the same time, will almost suffocate her partner with attempts to control. She has involved herself with mainly married or attached men – again we see the need to control, in her repeated attempts to separate someone from their partner, to be with her. This also may be due to the lack of desire to put any real effort into a healthy relationship. When Rachel does not receive the attention demanded, or the partner begins to pull away, Rachel will threaten suicide and ‘stalk’ the male friend until there is an absolute end to the relationship – she will however, use any means necessary to obtain and maintain control, only relenting once there is another that shows interest in her.
Fourth, the film darkly addresses human nature, with an ending that leaves Alex more or less as we found him at the beginning. The movie seems to say that free will is essential to human existence — that we must be able to choose to be good or bad, otherwise we cease to be little more than slaves or robots. Some people are inherently good, or evil, or weak — and there’s not always an explanation or solution for it. The government does not fare much better, in the film’s eyes. They try to fix Alex, not because it is the right or humane thing to do, but to control him. When Alex’s torture and suicide attempt are publicized and the government criticized for their actions, they reverse the treatment and cure him to remain popular. Principle is not involved. Even Frank Alexander has plans to use Alex for his own left-wing political objectives until he realizes who he really is, and seeks retribution.
On April 5, W Magazine announced on the Facebook that they joined Pinterest. Seeing as I wasn’t very impressed by their Tumblr, I was intrigued to see what they did with Pinterest. Because they are new to the world of Pinterest, they haven’t created that many “boards” yet, but I think this is a platform where the magazine recognizes they’ll be able to take full advantage of the amazing photography they have. Or, at least I hope they do.
All Australians know what a chocolate freckle is. For my American readers it's a chocolate button covered in sprinkles, usually about the size of a 5c piece.
It is possible not being successful at losing weight probably hasn’t been your fault at all.
It does not issue whether or not you are playing in a very low restrict table, or flexing your poker muscle in a no limits table, that proportion of your pot that goes to the home rake can truly add up. Even so, by means of rakeback offers you’ll be able to be getting a rebate as much as 40% – rebates that are compensated straight for your bankroll, which may help you develop up steadily via effective play. Once conscious with the several advantages of rakeback you’ll have difficulty understanding the reason why you waited this lengthy to indicator up for that program.
1. Warm temps: Although I don’t enjoy super hot weather, 78 degree weather was made for me!
2. Most people like their beer to have a decent 'head' after it has been poured.
Nor swayed by restless passion let me be,
Fingernails (Joe Ely)
Pasta with Spinach Pesto, Roasted Red Peppers and Sundried Tomatoes
He had told them that he wished to make a gesture to show his thanks to them for the services their order had given local people in the past, in honour of his father's memory.
I went into a deep meditation seeking union with spirit and feeling a heartfelt desire to be of help in some way. The following words came into my mind … to be shared with all, to offer us peace and assurance regarding the tragic events of 9/11, September 11, 2001.
Multiculturalism
“She’s 9 points behind Barack Obama right now. She’s looking good and she’s not even in the race,” said Johnston, who clearly hadn’t seen yesterday’s numbers that had Sarah within 5 points of the prez. “It’s scaring me a bit. I might have to move to Canada. If she’s running, you better believe I’m voting for Obama.”
Running around for play dates, scouts, family vacations
and then there is the matter of that sad piano.
Oct 5 2008 8:00P Egyptian Theater - Artivists Film Festival Closing Hollywood
Boludez (f)
Once darkness descends, Mac can change into any supernatural form that exists — which makes her as happy as she can be. That is, until Winn Thomas, the biggest geek in her senior class figures out there’s more to what hides in the dark than most are willing to acknowledge.
Carrie Fundingsland – I get a lot of inspiration from textiles. Whenever I start a new project the first thing I do is pull fabrics. A whole house can fall into place for me if I find that one perfect piece. I may never even use it in the project – I’ll just draw color combinations or vibe from it and go from there.
The tasting started off with Karl's own 'Melon Gibson', a Berliner Weisse and part of the legendary 'mullet series'. 'Melon Gibson' has a dry and crisp palate with a mild lactic sourness and a big whack of watermelon, very refreshing and a great starter.
And unknown trees lived there that gave off a phosphorescent gleam;
It's funny how we feel so much but we cannot say a word
:) My happy face.
9. You're A Mean One, Mr. Grinch by Thurl Ravenscroft
I’ve found many ideas from watching movies or TV shows, analyzing the story-line and how many times I’ve seen it done. I’ll even start re-thinking how a new twist could be done on it. I may even sort of re-write the story in my head and find I’m going places with it that have little to do with the original story and I’ve come up with something totally new. I give the idea new life by creating new characters who are different from the show/story that inspired the concept and start running with them. Then I set about to creat a setting that seems appropriate for those people and then begin to weave the adventure/mystery into their lives.
3) Last, but not least is a copy of Domino, Quick Fixes which you can read about here. I received a copy for my birthday but already have one, so if you weren’t able to get your hands on one, you still have a chance!
Papers are from a pack by My Minds Eye, stamp is from Stampin' Up and I used a Cuttlebug Branches embossing folder to emboss the rusty colored panel from SU and a Spellbinders die to cut out the name which was computer generated.
Meanwhile, IGN reports that the PS4 will be powered specifically by the AMD Radeon HD 7670 chip and the A8-3850 APU.
All the Big Six raised bills last year, by an average of 21 per cent, adding roughly £224 to the yearly bill. When wholesale costs fell, they cut charges by just 3.2 per cent on average. The easiest way to reduce prices is as I've said to remove the various bits and bobs of green legislation attached to the energy companies in the way of generation subsidies and the green tariff itself. The next step would be to remove foreign control from the UK's power generation industry. If the the UK power industry were controlled and run by companies based in the UK then at least the suspicion that we're subsidising foreign fuel bills will be put to rest.
Your glistening vines are not gonna have adhesive backs like the Prima ones do, so You'll need to
BZZZZZ! Wrong, but thanks for playing.
how long will we go on?
P.S. for the People: Did you know that the BAR Attorneys passed a very
The Angola 3 were immediately accused of the murder, and placed that same day in solitary. They have insisted ever since on their innocence, pointing to the lack of any physical evidence linking them to Miller’s death and suggestions that the main eyewitness against them was bribed by prison officials.
Although willing to listen to my requests for no mention of sweeps or induction, I began to get pressured into agreeing to growth scans and was told that I only had two weeks and then my home birth request would not be granted. Two weeks took me to Christmas Eve, which I'm sure helped them decide to go off call for me :) Luckily for me, I went into labour on the 19th.
Airlines:
Made in China" This information is from the Keurig website.
And these natural diamonds that apparently go up in value every year are also the only “investment” in the world where you’ve easily lost 50 percent of your money the moment you buy it. Try selling the ring one day. Even on EBAY, which has made it so easy for the public to monetize their unwanted ashtrays and garden gnomes, diamonds are the one “investment” where you are unlikely to ever recover a significant portion of what you paid.
Lorelai: Because then we can turn him into a frog.
Judy Stokesberry
Because that’s what it was really all about
Hollywood was abustle with hustlers in costume,
Will start with the good. I went skating today, it was fun, for the most part. I am going to a bout tomorrow. Someone brought cakes. I went into the Singer shop, spoke to the nice lady and they have now ordered me an Imperial French Curve, as opposed to the metric one they have in stock. WTF are centimetres anyway? They are a French invention that has been forced upon us and they make no sense. Yes, I understand the irony of ordering an Imperial French curve. Ha. If you ever have chance, I’d recommend ‘About The Size Of It’ by Warwick Cairns. It basically tells you why metric is an illogical pile of shite that jars horribly with nature, and why an English pint is bigger than an American one (the Americans are right, but then we get more beer in our pint lol, it’s all down to the French again, and the fact we used to trade a lot ) Hm. This has become a rant, and it’s in the ‘good’ section, Sorry about that.
I’ve found a few cheap thrills that have made their way into my vanity and will dwell top shelf until I make my millions and only lather my face with Creme de la Mar..(if you don’t know what this is I suggest you do your research)
(Next week I will talk more about picking a portfolio and what to put in it).
The logic is simple. Let’s say the government hires unemployed workers to build a road. These workers gain, but so does the local businesses as the wages are spent in their shops. The businesses can then start rehiring. These new workers spend their wages, allowing more businesses to hire more people and so on. This virtuous circle continues until the economy recovers. The government benefits as it is no longer paying unemployment benefit to people (so expenditure goes down) and the newly hired people can now pay tax (so revenue goes up)
All and all a provocative and fascinating night of dance provided by the exhilarating Cedar Lake Contemporary Ballet.
Melt the chocolate in a double boiler.
Have recommendations for enhancements?
6. As of know, you are arguably the 2nd worst President America has ever had. Who knows, you might even beat George Bush to the title before long.
Little One: “No.”
First Site
The hubby and I each had a small sliver for dessert with some fresh whipped cream.....this is definitely not a dessert that you'll be able to eat a lot of.....it's truly rich and decadent. That being said......the hubby, who is not a lover of all things chocolate......loved this dessert, and had it not been 10 pm already, probably would have gone back for more! That's enough for me.....it's a winner!!
As food or desserts to eat by lovely people
Even while classified as a Jr., though rare, they do some of these solo activities and also in plays produced by Johnnys specifically for Jr.’s to appear in. Its not just Johnnys that produces idols though, there are many other agencies in Japan, and all around Asia.
Now, please don't misunderstand what I'm saying--I realize that there are a lot of people who have little choice right now but to depend on certain organizations and social programs to help them put food on the table, and I'm not directing these comments at people who are truly needy. I'm directing these comments to those of you who aren't willing to live below your means now because you think someone will bail you out down the road when you're broke and hungry.
Now, I need to get busy. No sitting at the computer for me today (unless I'm doing homework).
I am so excited to share what Melda and I have been up to. If you haven't met Melda...well your missing out. She is so funny and fun to be around. Melda has been my sidekick, through most of my years owning a quilt shop and has traveled to every market with me for last four years. We get into lots of trouble together. Well......we have decided to go on a joint venture together......so far it has been fun!
Overnight the Asian markets were mostly higher gaining 0.2%. Most of Europe was closed for May Day, but the FTSE gained 1.3%. US index futures were again relatively flat overnight. The market opened at SPX 1397, one point under yesterday’s 1398 close. In the first half hour of trading the market rose to SPX 1400, then dipped to 1396. At 10:00 ISM manufacturing was reported higher: 54.8 vs 53.4, and Construction spending turned positive: +0.1% vs -1.1%. Monthly Auto sales had been posted earlier with Ford -5.0%, and GM -8.2%. The market then spiked up after the ten o’clock reports and continued to rally. By 10:30 the SPX had cleared the previous rally high at 1407 and continued higher. Around noon the SPX hit 1415 and began to pullback. Heading into the close the SPX hit 1405 and closed at 1406.
I guess that's the point of this whole blog though- to write what I feel and think- even the ugly crap- so other people know that it's ok to wonder or worry so long as in the end you try your hardest to be the best parent possible.
Everyone told me I had it too easy with my first two, as they didn't give me any grief (besides being a bit cheeky from time to time) and that Kristy would be my trouble maker.
Hi Everybody! Hope all is well or at least on the road to wellness in your lives! A quick thanks to Ken Barber for hosting a fabulous book signing at his boutique in Atlanta last weekend! It was a quick trip for me but one I definitely enjoyed. As I’m starting to understand, the more I’m out and about and answering questions for people the more I actually learn from you. Case in point:
Her performance later, alone on stage, and shoeless, was terrific. Inspirational. Moving...I won't spoil it, if you haven’t seen her – suffice it to say that she is in love with words, and always has been. She is a quietly great actor, too – to hear her perform Goneril’s speech to Lear, while fixing a man in the front row with a gentle gaze – was absolutely unforgettable.
We all know that sometimes when you die, you don't stay underground like you should. Maybe the right prayers weren't performed, or maybe you're full of hatred that reaches beyond the grave. Or maybe you were chosen by some dark god to become their general for their massive undead army.
Try reading through the Lord’s prayer line by line. Pause after each verse and pray what whatever comes to mind.
Then Aya meets a clique of girls who pull crazy tricks, yet are deeply secretive of it. Aya wants desperately to kick their story, to show everyone how intensely cool the Sly Girls are. But doing so would propel her out of extra-land and into the world of fame, celebrity...and extreme danger. A world she's not prepared for.
Why not go the whole hog and take all of everybody's earnings, and just give them enough back to feed and warm themselves? After all, money grows on trees, voters don't know what's good for them, we can trust the superior wisdom of people like Ed Balls and Peter Hain and the awful Mrs Balls. Those ghastly voters will only fritter the money away on lager and holidays and conservatories and their children. The philosopher geeks know best.
The Easter Giveaway prize winner is in for a real treat - 1 incredible Meri Meri kit suitable for decorating up to 24 cupcakes. Such cute liners and toppers! Plus a secret prize too :)
Roasted Veggies w/ Pan Seared Peaches & Microgreen Salad w/ Peaches & Dried Currants - February 28
Before we start I wanna say since the xbox is made by Sony I would personally want to see windows 8 on this new xbox. Would’nt you, tell me in the comments section below and also tell me what you wanna see and I’ll add it and put your name and twitter.
When I got into my research on Obesity… I found something that was very interesting about Americanized People of Mexican descent.
But yeah, taking an animal like that and shipping it around by slow mail in a crate? That’s just sick. Especially when you consider how much care those goblins DON’T take to observe the “Handle With Care” labels. Dude, you should have SEEN the shape my Champions of the Horde commemorative plates were in by the time they got to me, and those were even shipped THIRD class. I’m still looking for all the pieces of Rexxar. I don’t even want to THINK of what the fourth rate treatment would be.
So the idea is to bring as many Keepers into your life as possible. Minimize the time you spend with the Minimizers. Stay away from the Trash Heap! It may be tough to cut ties with them initially, but it would be unfair to carry on a relationship that was not right for you or them. Who do you want controlling your life? You of course. So you decide what is best for you. Chose your companions wisely. You would not expose yourself to radiation knowingly, so do not expose yourself to Toxic Relationships either!
Above is a thrift store picture and frame that I spray painted white and gave a coat of Chalkboard paint. Easy as a welcome sign for the event and it can be used for any future events.
Crazy Kind Of Life, is a natural progression of Bill Perry continued growth as an artist, his most complete and self-assured recording to date. While not seeking to break any stylistic barriers, it nonetheless offers an alluring package of what Bill calls "modern traditional" blues.
Trading Secretary
Relight Rule No. 6: Strangers in the night — did your relationship finish because of "relationship drift", i.e., you let things drift apart and became strangers. If you both recognise this you'll take more care a second time around and not take each other for granted.
1: 10:55-11:00
Looking over this list, I evidently need to read a lot more comics.
"Oooh, it's so cluttered up, did you see I almost fell over that rail? It's a deathtrap!"
I am the gentle autumn's rain.
Japanese Microbreweries
My first car was a turquoise Austin A40 Farina
"Depends on whose eyes and which woman."
Although Jackson reportedly confessed, i.e., can be referred to simply as a “murderer,” rather than as an “alleged murderer,” he’s bound to recant his confession, and plead not guilty. Nowadays, violent black felons frequently confess to their crimes, but almost always recant them, and then plead innocent. Many then even claim that they are the real victims, as the confessed attackers in the Central Park Jogger case later did (see my exposés here, here, and here).
Once (real 10 year bond rates) turn negative, a recession occurs, on average, 8½ months later.The median is 6 months.Results vary between 4 months and 18 months.The highest unemployment rate during the recession is, on average, 1.8 times the unemployment rate of the month when real interest rates turn negative.The lowest increase is 1.32 times; the highest increase is 2.03 times.Now the thing about this particular post is that the 3 month average had yet to turn negative, so I prefaced my pronouncement with the caveat that "if" rates went negative the following month, then:A recession starting between 2011 Q4 and 2012 Q4, with 2012 Q1 (is) most likely.Then on 2011-06-30 I wrote a lengthy piece about what was likely to occur between now and the recession entitled The events leading up to the coming downturn. The idea was that, because I had two other recession indicators that unerringly predicted past recessions in hindsight, then any potential recession coming up would also have to influence these indicators. I decided that there were going to be two possible situations occurring, an inflationary outcome or a deflationary outcome:An inflationary outcome would result in inflation outstripping the new monetary base. This would mean that, in the time leading up to the recession, inflation would increase...
AW the Alchemist was disappointed that El Capitan wouldn’t lead his troops today.
I already live with Humans Rights’ violation and severe one.Nobody asked me If I agree with what they vote.I find out that nothing has been signed and everything is still “under negotiation”
Welcome to the fourth edition of The Pulse -- The State of the Art -- a survey in words and pictures of the online artist community. Nearly 150 artists have answered a list of questions which make up The Pulse. Their responses will be presented as a series of online and print projects. Secret Sunday was the first project and the links to all the secrets can be found on the sidebar of my blog. The Book Guild is the second project and Chapter 3 starts right now!
Well maybe a bit.
There are many professionals and researchers who have studied the developing intellect of children in order to create a pattern that every doctor, parent, and health care professional can follow as a guideline in how a child is developing.
I love the cartoon-ish, punny character of this card. It is very different from my usual style and I really enjoyed making it. I have several little boys in mind as possible recipients, I hope their parents aren't too young to get the pun!
This incident has reminded me of something that happened a few years ago. There were various forms handed to all resident of Pitscottie, Kemback and Blebo Craigs asking the residents what they thought would be the best solution to "speeding" traffic through Pitscottie. The options included a 20 limit, a 20 limit with Strathkinness-esque speed bumps to fuck up your suspension. A 20 limit with Ceres-esque build outs, one other option which I'll cover later and a leave everything as it is.
You can respond with something like:
Chandler, AZ (March 19, 2012)—On Saturday, April 7, 2012, from 1:00-6:00 p.m., local young adult authors and East Valley teens will come together at Gangplank in Chandler to share a day of free writing workshops, a book sale, and a service project to support teen literacy. At the end of the day, teens will pick up a gently-used young adult book from a donated stash and “drop” it with an identifying bookmark in a high-traffic, public place on Thursday, April 12, 2012, to celebrate Support Teen Literature Day.
Good Morning Fellow Stampers,
For much the same reason, God could not give to you your life’s work as a Christian before you became a Christian. You could not comprehend spiritual instruction.
Q-DAY
One year ago April 14th, I was going to graduate college and we had a well thought out next step. One year ago April 15th that was completely flipped upside down; black Friday shook us to the core. Everything changed – our thoughts, desires, expectations… It was a rough couple months following, then, like a switch was flipped, everything began to change again, but for the better (to start, Nick’s brother met an amazing woman, beautiful inside and out, and their wedding helped pull us through the summer).
We are back where we were the first time Austin finished cancer treatment, when we assumed his kidney would keep chugging along until puberty when rapid growth and muscle development would put such stress on the little organ that it would stop working and finally need to be replaced. That scenario was thrown completely out the window during his relapse, as the kidney seemed to plunge deeper and deeper into distress, caused by the relentless onslaught of surgery, radiation and chemo. A year ago, we were hoping for a kidney that would work for weeks and months, not years and years.
But I count my blessings right
2) It allows me to be completely honest in a way I would not feel comfortable with if I were posting my comments online.
I wrote today’s first article last night but was not able to post it until this morning so that is why I want to post this article now. Here is the next contradiction initiated by our atheist friend. You will see the same pattern used again. The man has no clue about context and very little intellectual integrity.
the deck framed, and now the walls of the upstairs, the loft, have been built (no pics of that, more to come soon). i love framing, but it can be so deceiving. it goes so so quickly and it seems like the project is really moving, then it comes to a near halt as the next handful of steps are so slow. so patience will be a requirement soon on my part, especially since we have no deadline to have this project done.
5) Don't go to Orson if you think molecular gastronomy is totally stupid before you've even tried it.
I have a drawer at my desk where I keep notes of encouraging words
Rather than bitterness, Segel’s fairytale ending expresses optimism that interfaith couples can achieve happiness. For those of us who grew up in functional interfaith families, interfaith love is not just a romantic fiction. We need to stand up and be counted, to let the world know that in spite of the obstacles our parents still love each other, that we are not confused, and that we draw creative power from our double-belonging.
It has been busy in the office today but at least it’s not hellish like last week. I think I had some accomplishments today. I attended a meeting in behalf of my boss and had a long mentoring session with a staff, who is very intelligent but seems unable to write an intelligible proposal. Her IQ is way higher than those of the others that only one person can relate to her — me.
It was made of solid beech and was the perfect size at 61" bx 29". I decided I liked it even better than the Vika Amon. It's definitely sturdier that the Amon, which is made of MDF, and I think it has a nicer profile. It's not as thick and chunky as the Vika Amon top, and it's got nice beveled edges (see below). The trestle legs cost $10 each, and the tabletop cost $80. So, $100 later, I walked out of the store with a brand-new desk.
from Super Nana said...
She might chew a blanket
There is no greater gift to give to helpless infants, our own children. Also, this gift is not limited to the few minutes it takes to baptize but it is a gift with a promise to eternal life. Baptism is not dependent on our age but on God's grace and mercy. Baptism is a focus on Christ and His salvation poured out on us. Baptism is not a work of men but a gift from God that the Church freely shares as she has graciously received from the Lord.
I know I will always have friends to walk with me.
In the grand scheme of things, the workmanship is not the main reason why I bought the shirt (after all, a lot of companies do shirts well). It still comes back to the spirit in which MH designs her clothes, and that spirit comes across very well in her clothing. As long as this spirit holds true for me, I will happily justify her high prices and buy her clothes again when the right piece comes along.
I teach and direct the Creative Writing Program at UL Lafayette, so during the academic year, I squeeze writing in wherever and whenever I can. During the summer, grant-writing aside, I write almost every day, usually in the morning. Afternoons are okay, but I am liveliest, freshest in the morning. By evening, all I can do is read, so that is when I try to catch up on that enormous collection of unread books. A typical day begins with a cup of rose-scented tea and breakfast – right now, peaches and blackberries with yogurt because that is what is in season here. (I love picking fruit in summer! At least, early enough in the morning that the heat doesn’t do me in.) Followed by answering email. Then I gather my books, my notes, my self, re-read what I have been working on to plunge myself back into that language, and start writing.
CE Easter Celebration
“Why are you up, SoulDefender?”
4) “… To support the people next to us in distress.”
Yes this is a sci-fi action film that was embraced rather unexpectedly by the masses. It isn’t that deep, and it isn’t as good as Dark City. It’s rare to be able to go back and enjoy a film that spawned a franchise, especially one such as this that is composed of many recycled elements from other sources. But I did, and The Matrix still holds up all these years later. It’s a great mix of films that I love, and works to such an extent on every level that it deserved its cult audience.
The Sri Lankan government is also directed in this policy by its efforts to prevent Tiger personnel who survived the war and avoided its dragnet in the IDP camps from joining their brethren abroad. From church and/or Tamil personnel in Vavuniya, we now know that perhaps as many as 1000-2000 Tamils, rich people as well as key Tiger functionaries, slipped out of the camps in May-July 2009.[14]
This quest-line does not fit my good-ish dunmer, but probably my evil asshole-ish altmer.
"That's our chemical weapons lab."
Totally stressed out!
But other victims might not be as lucky.
That is why in oriental cultures it is the behavior that is stressed upon and the responsibility of regulation of such behavior is vested heavily on families and specifically on parents. Any cue that helps parents in such a huge task must be welcome. No matter what one thinks in one’s mind of and about criminality or crime or about any good action it is irrelevant unless it transfers in to Measurable, Actionable Behavior or MAB. By understanding MABs at the earliest, we can reinforce good actions and prevent bad actions taking place.
Now, go to www.facebook.com/irwinedelsteinassociates and post a link to your business website and/or facebook page to share with others. I’d love to see you there!
Comics
RE: Project Runway.
A few months ago I got an email from Liz in PR at Ben & Jerry's asking if I wanted to come up for VIP treatment at the Burlington Office. I told her no, I really don't like ice cream and she should find someone else. Just kidding. I said yes. I didn't write much (ok, or anything) about it because I didn't even know what it was.
I have used 2 images and 2 Doohickey Dies.
Here are some pictures from yesterday.
- everyone who meets you, adores you;
¼ cup Monterey Jack Cheese, shredded
Please don’t try this in your local library!
During those years when I was so called 'jobless' (earning but no contribution to the EPF, it equals to being no proper job) Penang actually came across my mind. I have the intention to move over to Penang if the situation in KL does not permit me to earn
But I like snacking, and sweets, and going to sleep in the AM.
Row 2: Ch 4, (dc, ch 1, dc, ch 1) in each ch-1 space across, dc in last st.
We have been hoping it was going to snow ... and we were SO excited when it finally started this morning!! We quickly threw on our snow clothes and headed outside. It came down so hard that we had several inches to play in. Mommy helped us build a snowman and even pulled us around the yard on our new sleds!!
When Spike made movies like “Do The Right Thing”, ”Jungle Fever”, “Mo Better Blues” and “X”, he always had the goal to teach while he entertained. During his appearance at ASU, he spoke of his love of history, which has always been a focus in his work. He has been one of the few mainstream black filmmakers that was had that desire and success at doing just that.
Preview the brewery’s facilities, enjoy live music, and drink FREE Texas craft beers!
I met Sam Brownback in 2002 when he was a U.S. Sentor representing Kansas. I was a reporter for a small daily newspaper in northwest Kansas, and at the last minute I was sent to cover a meeting he was holding with a few notables from the area. I had absolutely no idea who the guy was. I didn't follow politics (apart from the workings of the town council), and while I knew his title at the time was "Senator," I didn't realize it was prefaced with "U.S." instead of "state". I thought he was a local farmer who served part-time in the state senate, and since the assignment was dumped on me with no time to prepare, I didn't do the usual research.
Number 3 donation is from the Securities & Investment category. Simply put, this is big business. Both Obama and Hillary got a $5 million and change. This is just Wall Street minding the store and keeping a pulse on the election - no surprise there.
Dude Time Doodles/Bonibleaux Designs is sponsoring the Pile It On Challenge this week, so we're having a "For/from a Man" challenge (one of my favorite themes!) Perfect time to make some of those male cards by piling on this week's challenges! Pile It On has a great list on their site, as does Feline Playful. This challenge is very special to me, because it brings together two of my teams; I just adore working with these ladies (and gentleman!), and am inspired by their creative work every week.
Now consider a group of Baboons. They are the loudest, most dangerous, most obnoxious, most viciously aggressive and least intelligent of all primates. And what is the proper collective noun for a group of baboons?
So if this is such a simple story, why am I blogging about it?
Here are some more pictures:
The second time is right when the new year models are coming in. These are the cars that the dealerships will want on their floor, so to make room they’ll be willing to negotiate more on last year’s models. Many of the car manufacturers only make big changes to their models every 4-6 years. During the other years, even though the new model is coming out, the changes may be very small (such as a front bumper being slightly angled more). These are the times that you can get the older model for a lower price. This is where your research will come into play. If the old model is almost exactly like the new one, then you have some automatic savings in buying the older model. However, if the older model has had issues that the new incoming model fixed, then you might want to consider the newer model to save you some headache (and even some money).
“So, you’re not expecting anyone?”
This was due to their cooperation with a natural cycle in the Earth – which is apparently governed by a meta-intelligence that exists at the planetary, solar, galactic and universal level – namely the Source Field.
Three drenched hens, two turtles dead and a partridge in a black sea.
So, ladies, please email me and let's start the conversation about your prizes! Well done! Thank you for the awesome inspiration!
The price sticker on the box got me rather curious, and combined with the info that was on the listing, seems the seller didn't know very much about figs, and bought the fig along with a bunch of other figs after winning an estate auction.
I added a fun vertical accent using the AWESOME new Train Track Border Taylored Die! The sentiment, "Choo! Choo!" was cut out and layered with Circle Nestabilities again.
Blending in the UK has a bad rep, the initial, and noble history of bar and brewery blended beer starts with Entire gives way to Porter and leads to Stout to a practice undertaken in secret by many breweries in the UK, especially the larger ones. It hit the buffers when scrupulous and unscrupulous landlords started cutting corners and blending slops on the fly to try and increase their margins, usually as a result of monopolistic owners squeezing them very hard. It is also the fault of the terrible Auto Vac.
If during the term of the agreement the licensee sells that part of his operations that is significant to the licensed technology, a third party acquires that part of the licensee’s operations, or if a competition of the licensor takes an equity position of sufficient percentage in the licensee or is able to obtain access to the licensed technology in any other way, the licensor will have the right to terminate the licence within a period of 90-120 days.
Black Ink by Making Memories
Having said that , I am sick and tired of dwelling on the negative aspects of this tragedy. I am pretty sure that there are going to be many solutions to this problem over the coming months and years. I am not suggesting that this can ever be a "make lemonade from lemons" situation. I am just saying that we will find a way to repair the damage.
Just before finishing this blog I have to make two remarks… One is about the beautiful ‘Parfumerie’ space where the milonga takes place, with an elegant and simple ambience which I found very much in agreement with the one of the city. Second, about the perfect organization, including hospitality for the foreign tangeros like me, especially considering that this year it was an ‘one man show’ (Sarah’s show!)… A bientot a tous!
Last week I left you in suspense with these bare Ikea chairs that needed a little something to help them fit in with the new table...
Such agreements, based upon robust market values, with significant borrower equity, 25%, with borrowings limited to a sustainable repayment capacity, comprise the very best type of home mortgage arrangement. Such agreements can be bundled together to constitute a mortgage-backed security and sold off to financiers, very likely at face value.
Sonia’s son Rahul Gandhi, whose real name is Raul Vinci. He got admitted to Harvard in quota but was thrown off soon because he was incompetant.
Absenteeism- When a catechist needs to be absent you follow the procedure for being absent that is written in the catechist handbook that you signed to verify that you understood what your responsibilities are and the rules that you must follow.
Indeed, bad weather is coming, as well as it’s going to become method more enjoyable for viewers compared to Bruce Wayne. (Would you would like to cope with Bad thing your self? We did not believe so.) You are able to check out the actual full list of this summer’s motion and sci-films, below. Maintain your eyes away this week for the rest of Moviefone’s 2012 Summer time Movie Examine.
I wrote a section in the Cask Report about how the online beer community is actually helping drive the growth of craft brewing in the UK, spreading enthusiasm and knowledge, giving brewers a platform to showcase their beers. With my marketing hat on, when you look at the twiss ups, meet the brewer events, V-blogs, promotions, beer swaps etc that are happening now, I think we're seeing a new marketing model emerge, where consumers and manufacturers work together to promote the category. Sure we can be inwards looking and cliquey at times, as any community can, but please, keep it up - this is brilliant.
For the base
I made my own desiccant for my shoes. My dad owns some Stinky Pinkies. They don’t make them anymore, but they’re bags that soak up smell and moisture in shoes. When it needs recharging, you set them in the sun and they…well…recharge. So I did a little research on how to make your own and found that you can make them with silica gel. I went to a local craft store (I had a $20 gift certificate) and bought some silica gel, and found out that if I need to ‘recharge’ it, I stick it in the oven for a few minutes and done! So it’s reusable for a long time!
Because it is a healing cure
Pulphead by John Jeremiah Sullivan
Plead in vain, and proudly answered–
Well its Sunday again :O) So that means it's time for another funtastic challenge here at One Stitch At A Time.
Usually we see a lot of the same pups from previous walks we have done. This time we didn't, but we did finally come across another Boston Terrier. Her name was Penny. Just like Swisher's Moms name. She was a nice gal.
Ciao for now xxx
You have come here to create,
The debate about gay marriage is not about civil rights and certainly not about the equal rights amendment which was passed following the Civil War to ensure that newly enfranchised black citizens received formerly denied protections. The 13th Amendment, ratified on December 6, 1865 bans slavery. The 14th Amendment was ratified on July 9, 1868. Neither applies to homosexuality.
Intestines open wide to summer’s sweating air,
Guidelines ratified by the National Union of Journalists (UK and Ireland) for all its members to follow when dealing with race relations subjects.
You, the Living – honeymoon fantasy
Many email marketers have latched onto the fact that a person’s name is powerful—you probably receive emails with subject lines like, “Methuselah, top 10 copywriting tricks”. And many emails you get will start with your first name; long ones will include it several times.
Are you trying to eat more vegetables? That's something that we are always working on. I realized that we have lots of recipes for greens that we have enjoyed through our various CSA (community supported agriculture) shares, and it was time to compile them. So we pulled together our favorite greens recipes in one spot: Getting Your Greens.
Let’s change these feelings to love and gratitude and see what happens next.
I hope this week is going well for you. I am beading getting ready for my show, and also for a class this Sunday. Yes, I know it is mother's day but what's better than beading on that day? I have so many emails from people on how to loom bead. I am so glad that there is a high interest in it again. I have been doing it since I was a child. I use it in so many aspects of my art. Here is a necklace I finished this morning. It has a loom foundation, flatwork, brick stitch sculpture, peyote edging, embellishments, and loop dangles. If you want to get started in loom beading check out our beading looms in our Beadwright etsy store or our website nicolecampanella.com
Pity the poor Edinburgh Fringe staff at this time of year, though – indeed, pity them at any time of year.
Every now and then, I enjoy the Neutral colors. I used Basic Gray, Basic Black and Whisper White on my card. I used the Mixed Bunch stamp set that has the coordinationg blossom punch. I added the silver pearls and still keep the layout simple. Hope you like it.
Kent, Steven L. (2001). The Ultimate History of Video Games: The Story Behind the Craze that Touched Our Lives and Changed Our Worlds. Three Rivers Press: New York.
He's a deep thinker I guess:
I figure seeing as I've been out of the blogging game for so long I will start off with a nice easy Take It or Leave It II post.
This year Halloween was great! I really enjoyed the night as we walked around the neighborhood with friends and our family, the kids going to doors we would never approach otherwise. The people handing out candy were friendly, the kids often said trick-or-treat in unison and even said thank you most of the time. The older kids helped the younger kids without being asked. And I now firmly feel that you are never too old to trick-or-treat. I even dressed up, instead of just putting on our hat w/ ogre horns and calling it my costume. We arrived home tired but content. The kids dumped out their candy for sorting and trading, while the men caught a bit of the football game on TV.
Now for the recipe:
ANGELS TRANSACTIONS:
Here's a guy who not only defined rock guitar (though I must pay respects to Paul Burlison for inventing raga rock on The Johnny Burnette Rock & Roll Trio's version of "The Train Kept A-Rollin'") and wrote some high-energy pieces to show it off, he was a Hell of a lyricist. You can keep Elvis, Pat Boone, and Buddy Holly. I'll take Chuck...and Eddie Cochran.
A few months of living outside herself went by, and she realized that the nightmares were real. So gradually that she hadn’t noticed, the nightmares had taken control of her life, replacing the unknown fear that had kept her running all those years. The nightmares kept her from running anymore, so she knew she had to face them. She looked around and saw the shards laying on the ground, the shards of a beautiful red cup. The shards of the complete and shiny red cup she used to be. Frantically she started gathering up the shards, but the speed in which she picked them up made her cut herself, and her bleeding fingertips made it impossible to hold onto the shards.
So tell me….WILL YOU GET YOUR BUTT OUTTA THE BOX NOW?
Albeit men mock thee with their similes
In Canada, the government stopped making one-dollar and two-dollar bills, and recently killed off the penny as well. Instead, Canadians use one-dollar coins, called “loonies,” which were named for the loons (a duck-like bird) on the front. Two-dollar coins, which have polar bears on them, are called “toonies.”
Regardless of a papal indult, von Glerken’s opus does raise aesthetic and theological questions. Is this artwork or obscenity? Should the Diocese of Würburg be displaying this work? Is the Last Supper anywhere that a “celebration of life” takes place? How does von Gleken’s Last Supper compare vis-à-vis Leondardo da Vinci’s masterpiece? What does von Gleken’s Last Supper mean to you?
Now Dad’s excited. I’m from Wiarton. Well, says the guy, I’m actually from a little village called Red Bay, a few miles west. Dad says, yeah, I know the place, me too. Well actually I was born at home, in a cabin, a couple of miles out. Dad says, yeah, me too! Back then, it was unusual for women to go all the way to town to have a baby at the hospital. Everybody had relatives or neighbors or a local midwife.
Council Member Letitia James
So, happy cooking till the next one!
Corn Flour, enough to coat the pork balls
True, at times she crossed the line between observer and participant, but I was on her side, so I forgave her. Plus, I know how hard it is to walk that line.
I have been on the Digital Tuesday DT from the beginning and have dealt with the sponsor stuff for a long time, so..........I am going to take over the Digital Tuesday challenge blog, which means this will not be the last challenge and there will be many more to come :)
women human rights groups from all over the world
10) Receive your free object.
Once everyone has arrived and is sitting down, the first course is served. Last week this was Soupe de tomate et basilic avec des chevre toasts (tomato and basil soup with pesto and goats cheese toasts); I then served Merlan au Fenouil – (whiting with roasted fennel) and a roti du Porc, (roast pork) with beans and potatoes cooked in the oven on a bed of salt (a suggestion from the market stall holder where I bought the potatoes, guess what, they were really salty!). For pudding I served a plum crumble with homemade ginger ice cream, (the French love le crumble!) then coffee accompanied by a delicious 10-year-old rum from Martinique that one of the guests had brought.
I find myself watching more television online than on my TV nowadays and it’s pretty nice to only have a few 30 second commercials instead of 3-5 minutes of commercials that I would have to watch if I actually watched the shows when they first air on television.
Good bye, big weight gainer.
Well, I might have been very quiet lately, as I have been bitten by a craft bug making these adorable ATC's
Wishes: What typical French characteristic do you wish you possessed? (If you say ability to to eat mounds of Camembert and stay thin, I may smack you.)
2 members of the public were arrested when tensions boiled over as the Terrorists tried to ruin the homecoming parade. How many more British people will need to be arrested before our council & the Police listen?
Whenever I need a still-life type photograph, I approach the project the same way as if I were painting a scene, setting up first the easel to establish a point of view. In photography, I use a tripod with which to set up my point of view. While using the camera’s view finder, I begin placing the elements on the table, adding, removing, putting back into the frame an element, building the set.
I was so moved by this message from the Holy Father! I anxiously await the day I can enter into religious life!!
By Charles Paxton (Local Broadband Champion)
As we drove northwards the black clouds disappeared and and a pale yellow sun appeared. The light was incredible - it literally sparkled.
Obama’s overall job approval on the economy has slid below 40% for the first time, with 57% disapproving. And strong disapprovers outnumber approvers by better than two-to-one. – LAT, 7-26-11
I have had some awesomely weird tables in my many lunch shifts these past two weeks. The best one being my first table Sunday. I was folding napkins when the hostess seats a middle aged man with a puffy gray David Hasslehoff mullet. He was with a very trim, very made up brunette. The doop (the paper that tells me their name, how many reservations they've made before, when they sat etc.) said they were a recommendation from a local hotel concierge. Awesome, so that means they're too lazy or think they're too busy to make an actual choice on restaurants and blindly go where someone tells them to. This bugs me, who is so important they don't have time to be adventurous, this friggin' guy. I glance at the top of the doop, the last name is french, ok no big deal. I greet them and welcome them, give them the whole deal about how our water is filtered a whole song and dance basically asking them in they want sparkling or flat water. After some debate they and by they I mean he told me what they wanted. I turned and told the new server assistant what they wanted while I went to go do something in the back. As I came out the s.a. told me I'd told him the wrong kind, they wanted flat water not sparkling. Oops, well it's just water, no big deal. OH BOY was I ever wrong. When I went over to let them know the specials, he literally puts his hand up in a stop motion while I'm talking and interrupts me. He points to the water glass in front of him and says "You brought me sparkling, I OBVIOUSLY asked for flat. If you can't understand my accent because I'm french tell me now"...The brunette accompanying him looked pained. My mouth nearly fell open, I understand you're a dick. Prick is the same in Swahili, Vietnamese, English or French. A dick is a dick no matter what language, a dick with a stupid haircut is especially annoying. If you're this picky about your water this is going to be a VERY painful table. I smile and tell him it was a simple mistake, one that I will not repeat. I manage to tell them the specials even they they're not listening. The inspection of each others cuticles was far too engrossing. Did I mention they were sitting side by side at a four top table? Yeah, I hate that. If you're going to be that couple that insists on sitting in a 4 top booth, don't be so lovely that you need to sit next to one another and whisper,it's wierd. You're adults, not 4 year olds no one cares what you have to say it's ok to sit across from one another. You're not exactly communicating confidential nuclear secrets here. So he orders the hanger steak, but it's not that easy no, of course not. Mister frenchyhoff wants it Black and Blue. "Do you know what that is?" "Yes sir I am familiar with that temperature." WHY would you want your HANGER steak Pittsburgh? You're an idiot. "Good, because you didn't understand me before, blue is VERY rare, cold and rare. Do you understand?" Diiiiiiiiiiick. I nod and smile and write "temp-D bag" on the slip of paper in my book.Not only B&B he wants the sauce on the side, of course. His lady friend orders the salmon. It's too early on a Sunday to play your psychic friend ma'am I need to know which salmon? I ask her what temp she'd like her salmon and she just stares at me. I know this means she has no idea what this means, I think she's probably only eaten her salmon smoked or from a can. I kindly tell her salmon usually comes medium rare or even medium, and would she like that? Then I get the idea to talk her into the Salmon and eggs, to just avoid this whole fiasco, after 3 recooks the night before I didn't want to make the managers run anymore redcards. Salmon and eggs is smoked and always good I tell her. "Oh fantastic, sauce on the side please". Sauce on the side is health conscious I understand but it's really annoying and the cooks hate it. So after their entrees come out I do a check back. I had mentally prepared for the fussing I was sure to hear. Frenchyhoff complained that his steak was dry and asked me if they cooked it in the sauce and then cooked it off. What sauce, the Bearnaise sauce? I think not. I smile and since I was tired of listening to his lispy french bullshit I tell him that the sauce and the steak are cooked entirely separate. I didn't mention that a hanger steak is known as the butcher steak for a reason as it's not fatty and if you PITTSBURGH it, it's going to be dry. It's not a ribeye or a NY strip, there's not enough fat to make that great. Needless to say when I saw the 13% tip I wasn't really upset.
My people are tired, cranky, demoralized. We won't accomplish anything. Their people are eager and passionate. They are ready to tackle the system and really change things in this country. Who knows what they'll accomplish in those first two crucial years? Right. Exactly. Now go change your shorts and tell your friends to vote for me this fall.
Hulk should only show up in major events, during the most serious crises and against only the most dangerous of threats. When Hulk shows up, it should be the “shit just got real” moment for the villain of the crisis. Most of Marvel’s villains should be scared shitless of the Hulk, as should most of the heroes. When he shows up, you just crossed a line too far and you are going to pay dearly for it.
get it, really get it, pushing up your glasses,
So instead today my daughter and I are making an Australian Meat Pie and a pavlova. The meat pie is the traditional Australian fast food. It is to Australians what the hot dog is to Americans. Every suburb has a bakery selling meat pies and sausage rolls and most have more than one.
We've been so busy with work and school that we didn't start any renovations until we'd been in the house for 1 year! Actually my husband and his brother did take out a second door to our master bedroom - it was right in the middle of our living room! But other than that, nothing big.
So when I ran out for lunch, I called the bank to complain. Then the text messages start pouring in. Ready for this? These are all from my sister. I did not correct the spelling so you can see what I'm dealing with.
When writing an article about little-studied Puritan funeral services, Ulrich included the phrase "well-behaved women seldom make history." The phrase was picked up and soon was widely quoted and printed across the country. It continues to be seen on greeting cards, T-shirts, mugs, plaques, and bumper stickers. She recounted how her now-famous quote has taken on a life of its own in an October 2007 interview: "It was a weird escape into popular culture. I got constant e-mails about it, and I thought it was humorous. Then I started looking at where it was coming from. Once I turned up as a character in a novel - and a tennis star from India wore the T-shirt at Wimbledon. It seemed like a teaching moment - and so I wrote a book using the title." Well-Behaved Women examines the ways in which women shaped history, citing examples from the lives of Rosa Parks, Christine de Pizan, Elizabeth Cady Stanton, Harriet Tubman, Virginia Wolf and many other notable women in American and world history.
You probably thought I'd given up on my Living Room Plan List. No, it's just taking me the usual forever to finish a room. One of the items on the list was to recover the cushions of the cane barrel chair (inherited from my grandparents).
All of Herman’s cards were marked in advance
– Maybe for future scrimmages Spike (the cartoon mascot) could make an appearance, to entertain some of the kids.
Julianne's team was back in the top spot this month, too, although they did lose one round Saturday. They also were joined by their new team member, who had never quizzed before Saturday. I hear he answered three questions in one round, which is fantastic for a brand new quizzer, especially thrown into a veteran division.
Here are some of our finished creations! Are you hungry yet? :)
How does God teach you about His sovereignty? About honoring Him through your work?
In a darke caverne at the signe of the Elephante
So instead of pills, we chose to focus on bite prevention. This means that from before dusk till after dawn, we keep ourselves covered with clothes and copious amounts of DEET.
12- Plastic Man" - 3:34
That’s the kind of wife I’m married to. These are the kinds of songs that come out of those stories. It’s a special song and I’m grateful for all the people who’ve walked through loving unconditionally. I hope the song means as much to folks as it does to me.
But I’ll write for what its worth, what its worth.
Uncover the brownie layer and lift it from the pan using the foil. Cut into mummy shapes using a gingerbread cutter.
Then I work work work… I cannot wait for my lunch time! Because I *love* my Didi-made food and reading a good book. It’s the best way to escape for a short hour in the middle of your day. I read a quote once about books, “Books might truly be the only magic in this world” ~ I love books!
Back again!! today is a VERY special day for my little sister!! yes, my "little" sister... i remember having to tag her along with me when she was about DD2's age... taking her to the mall when i would go hang out with friends, picking her up from school, taking her shopping and all that good stuff... my little sister and I are many years apart (no i'm not going to give away my age, LOL) just know that is more than the norm... and today she turns the big SWEET 16!!!! gosh i feel really old.... hahaha!!! ok, maybe i'll feel even older when she hits the big 2-1... LOL.... easy now, i can wait for that!
Located at the BurnLaw Centre, an organic farm of 45 acres of pasture, old and new woodland, wetland, orchard and kitchen garden, in the Northumberland, North Pennines not far from Haydon Bridge, While there the sun shone, the landscape lit up and in the evening the stars shone like I have never seen before. One of our group, Jon was so star struck one evening that he walked back to our dormitory through the pond.
F-F-F-F-G-G-G-G *tap* A#-A#-A#-A#-C-C-C-C *tap*
Murrieta's Caches (California) - Joaquin Murrieta was a Mexican Patriot, forced off his land by American settlers in California. He became a desperado, leading a group called The Five Joaquins. They stole cattle and committed robbery and murder in the 1850's. He is said to have hidden several large caches of stolen gold: 1. $175,000 hidden off HWY 299, between Burney, California and Hatcher Pass. 2. $200,000 off HWY 36, between Susanville and Freedonyer Pass. 3. $140,000, buried in a strongbox by the Feather River, in a canyon south of Paradise, California. 4. This is the one that got Murrieta killed. The amount is not mentioned, but it was said to be a wagon load of gold. He and his men had stolen it from a mine, but a group of Indians ambushed them and took it, hiding it in a burial cave near the Old Carrizo Stage Station in the Anza Borrego Desert.
In a 2008 poll by 20th Century Fox, the .44 Magnum finished as the 2nd most popular movie weapon…..behind the Light Sabre from Star Wars….
1. I do not currently own a wheel fully adequate for serious art yarn spinning (although with extra effort I can make do–for now). By the end of the second day, I was eyeing the Aura wheels owned by Lexi and a few of my classmates with envy, so maybe that’s something to save up for. In the meantime, I may look into getting a bulky flyer made for Pumpkin if at all possible, because one thing I discovered this weekend is that for many art yarn techniques you are in trouble if you can’t start your wheel with your feet. I took Wheelie, my Ashford traditional, along since she has a bulky flyer, and Lexi ended up having to help me start her for the more advanced section of the second day, since my hands were otherwise occupied.
#2 - Let that be a lesson to you: If you want to impress underage drinkers, always pay for their beer.
JoBeth continues to star in movies and bit roles in television series, but she will forever be known as that hot number in shorts just a tad too high--thankfully!--, thwarting demons in her southern California home-gone-array, and belting her hot body’s worth of screams.
“Actually, I’m from Ontario.”
Ralcorp Holdings (NYSE:RAH) recently announced they will delay issuing the all important Q4 and year-end numbers because they have to complete impairment tests on some intangible goodwill assets. Read the headline and see how investors are being manipulated.
Another thought: when we are happy, we sing, we hum, we make a happy sound. Perhaps the formation wants us to do that. What miracles might we create if we collectively sang in harmony?
Despite having hella hard adoption time. Despite the fact that I have been so recently gutted by family situations. Despite it all. Because we do suffer, because we all suffer,but we get up and try again. And funny people are the luckiest people because they are not afraid to both love and poke fun at Barbara Streisand.
This statement is being tweeted at the moment by the Muslim Council of Britain (@MuslimCouncil) with a request to retweet. It is online at http://www.mcb.org.uk/article_detail.php?article=features-86.
I was having a conversation with the boyfriend the other day about Modern Warfare 3. I see him playing this game for hours and hours on end yet I have no idea what it’s about. I have a general idea about it involving guns, shooting, war, and challenges but that’s about it.
“Come on, you can do it,” was one early comment. “Come on stage, man, you can do it.”
As Task Force Cujo’s armored tactical vehicles rolled up to the secure gates of the Afghan National Police’s District 11 headquarters, the mood grew ominous – a sense that indicated the 11-person coalition ANP advising unit was there to help but on a higher state of alert.
Marilyn
“Conservatives have figured out their moral basis, and you see it on Wall Street. It includes: the primacy of self-interest. Individual responsibility, but not social responsibility. Hierarchical authority based on wealth or other forms of power. A moral hierarchy of who is “deserving,” defined by success.” [George lakoff, Framing Memo for OWS]
The clock had stopped, but time kept running on. March came and went, bringing with it reminders of all the events and celebrations that mark our lives. Mothers' Day, quickly followed by the birth of Penny-Rose my beautiful new granddaughter, then my own birthday, and at the end of the month a wedding. As the days passed, the sideboard filled with cards - congratulations and thank-you notes, photographs and invitations. Before long we couldn't see the clock at all.
The other day Lyndee came running into her Mommy’s room. “I figured it out. I figured it out.” Ami said “What did you figure out, Sweetie?” “Strawberry Shortcake does have a mommy. Strawberry Shortcake just said ‘Let’s look in my mommy’s cookbook.’ So she does have a mommy!” Lyndee thought a moment and said quietly “I don’t know about the other girls. I don’t know if they have mommies. They didn’t say anything about their mommies’ cookbooks.” Lyndee has been worried about Strawberry Shortcake…no mommy is on her video. Whew! Now she can relax a little. Life is so much simpler when you’re four and a half!
The sense of black’s radicality, as simultaneously the root and the extremity of color, is already clear. What calls for commentary is the relation between this radicality and the emotion of color, which is now addressed as simultaneously the emotion of specific color and the emotion of color itself. The relation implies two meanings for black emotion: 1) the feeling of other-than-color at color’s root; 2) the feeling of other-than-color at color’s intensity. The seizure of black emotion is consciousness passing like a current between these poles. On the side of the object, black emotion is the affect of seeing that the thing itself, all that one does not see, is black. Here black is the unseen of the seen. On the side of the subject, black emotion is the affect of seeing that the image, all that one does see, is black. Here black is the seen of the unseen. In one direction black is the not-revealed of a color, the vision of there being more to see. In the other direction black is the only-revealed of a color, the vision of there being nothing seen. This epilectic emotion is a blackout, not a blackout of vision, but a witnessing of the blackout that vision is: the passionate suspension of vision within the endlessness of its never having been or actual impossibility. It is absolutely important, therefore, that the text says “a color,” signifying the complicity of black emotion with specificity, individuation, presence, facticity. This shows black is the index of color and the ecstatic character of black emotion, in the sense of an experience that refers to the impossibility of its own taking place, following Bataille: “THE OBJECT OF ECSTASY IS THE ABSENCE OF AN OUTSIDE ANSWER. THE INEXPLICABLE PRESENCE OF MAN IS
Who cared about the fringe people that couldn’t afford that? They weren’t gamers, they were just there. Then over time they became a huge segment of the market. The truth of the matter is that there are a lot more people that can’t afford to keep up with the rat race than can. I use to be able to and now I just absolutely can’t. So I pulled back. I refuse to buy games at $50 and $60. That’s just not for me. I still like games. I want to play them, I just can’t afford them out of the gate. So I wait. After all t he waiting is done I find the game at a cheaper price. For instance I found Super Street Fighter IV for $25 when the game was still at $40. That’s in my price range and I get a lot out of that game. I saved $80 on six games during a b2g1 free sale at Gamestop.
What is not wanted are people who really are engineers, or farmers or cooks. The assembly line has no room for thinking outside the proscribed process.
A love which has become a part of me
Building a good life is not just about the tasks of daily living. Given a choice between learning how to do laundry and making friends, most of us would choose making friends. Relationships are core to our quality of life. And the good news is, everyone wants relationships. Our communities are full of people who are looking for more connection, more friends. This is not just a disability issue, and in fact people with disabilities often have much to contribute to others who struggle with loneliness, much to offer in a relationship. When we ask staff what they enjoy most about their work, they invariably say their relationships with the people they’re being paid to support. Our own lives are enriched by having people with disabilities in them. The opportunity to share this gift with people in the community is just waiting to be tapped. We’ve met cashiers who tell us the highlight of their week is when “Brian” comes in to do his shopping; or a waitress who was moved to tears when we asked if we could take a picture of her and “Denny” (“he’s been coming here for years, and he always looks forward to seeing you,” we explained, “he considers you a friend”): it turned out she looked forward to seeing him every week too, and had been wanting to get to know him better but didn’t know what to do or say; she couldn’t see a way in, partly because Denny always had staff with him. Her assumption was that only someone with special training could interact with Denny, and since she didn’t have this training, she couldn’t possibly have anything to offer him.
BBC Director General Mark Thompson is said to have told an internal group with some pride that one transmitted episode of the sitcom The Thick Of It was only “four short of 100 fucks”.
Is that really too much to ask for?
Under President Clinton, the Republican-led House Oversight Committee voted to hold Attorney General Janet Reno in contempt over documents regarding campaign finance law violations.
Monday is here upon us once again, and again it's just too soon for my liking. I thought I would never be able to get out of my bed this morning!
The Management School of
Many of you may have already viewed the following Sir Ken Robinson’s Ted Talk or RSA Animate video, but if you haven’t seen it before, it’s definitely worth a look.
Now there are those who characterise the debate over Catholic schools as being the battle between the CESEW who wish to abolish the ‘Catholic’ and certain Bishops who wish to abolish the ‘schools’. It seems clear to me that this is absolutely not what Bishop Michael is driving toward. Quite the opposite, in fact. He is asking, with rather more focus than which we have become accustomed: ‘just what is a Catholic school?’
"Within their business of killing, they have surveillance people, intel people and shooters. They have a degree of specialization," said David Cuthbertson, special agent in charge of the FBI's El Paso division. "They work day in and day out, with a list of people to kill, and they get proficient at it."
2) Swiper. He’s, quite simply, the least annoying character on Dora. His “oh, man!” is adorable, and it’s proved in the Christmas special that he has a good heart.
Tons of history, and tradition.
I have been working a lot on my health...in practically every aspect. The stress of loss, life, and just my own faults have really taken a toll.
Seven Palins fibbing
We went to the hotel, and took some rest, phone call
you if you hunger and thirst after righteousness. Blessed are the merciful, the
bits and bobs that go along with a BIG MOVE.....
Fast foreword to being a mom, with two kids. The only thing that I carried on to adulthood from the experience is that I spoil my kids. Yep. Sure do. I admit it. They are sooooo spoiled at Christmas. And birthdays too.
For those who are selective about their dances or who seemingly feel less compulsion to dance than others, does that indicate that they are at a contented place in the balance of companionship and non-companionship? Are they more secure in their solitude? Or secure in their perception that they can get the dances they want when they want them; that they are only interested in sharing their dance/DNA where it will have the most benefit? Or does their restraint say something about their lack of libido/virility? For those on the extreme end who rarely choose to dance at all, are they, or at least are they seen as, "tango frigid" or "tango impotent," and does that perception seemingly point to their manner outside of tango as well?
So, here is me, doing what I love. Blogging. Enjoy my personal snaps from Salzburg, Austria. The land of The Sound Of Music - a musical I loved watching, while growing up! It's definitely a place I will love to return to, in the Summer, when the hills are donned with glorious sunshine, and decked with flowers amongst the meadows.
The irony is that the same work I did in the elimination of their jobs also was put into place within HP to totally outsource their managed services department. I worked myself out of a job. There have been job opportunities that I have turned down, jobs that would have been very good money, because I just will not do that type of work ever again, better I be hurting then to inflict that pain on many others. I am sure someone will do the job, but, it will not be me and I will sleep better at night. It is time for everyone to take some form of action. Write to your reps and let them know that the war is wrong and the troops need to come back now, that the economy is the big picture and needs to be fixed fast. Try to do what you can with buying local, but as many above have stated, it is hard to distinguish what is behind the corporate logo and their clever ways to hide and disguise the truth and put a spin on any questionable practice.
Last weekend, an unknown woman dropped by Washington Square Park very late on a quiet Sunday night. I met her eating a salad, sitting elegantly on the granite benches with her agent, Lisa Williams. I had seen her sing the previous Friday and was enthusiastic about speaking to her personally.
Yesterday, after nap time, we decided to get back out and take advantage of the still night to see the monuments. We started at the White House, walked past the Old executive Offices, past the Washington Monument, over to the World War Two Memorial, past the Reflecting Pool that isn’t there right now, through the Korean Memorial, we said hi to President Lincoln, and finished the evening at the Vietnam Memorial.
I sickened, turned, and ran. The great slime kings
let’s walk together,
but the nightside, closeted words
It is the story of a Lakshmi a rentable camel that Chotu helps cure and Laptan, a young man-helper in the dhaba, who hasn’t given any thought to improving his mind. He thinks dreaming of Amitabh Bacchanji and other movie heroines will make him a great man and who can be terrified by ghostly noises!
It's fucking spooky.
I screwed up here- this amazing light was only $12.00 and I passed it up! CAN YOU BELIEVE THAT! I came in the next morning, convinced I should buy it, and it had sold already. IN ONE DAY. You gotta snatch things up at this shop, otherwise they are gone before you know it.
The Bucs are famous for the Tampa 2 defense, in which quality safeties and linebackers capable of playing the run and the pass are necessary; and the Bucs landed both of those in Mark Barron and Lavonte David. Martin will be a great complement to Blount, as he is a much better back in the passing game.
After work, Michelle and I braved the winds to visit this little patch of bluebells. When you're wearing hyacinth it would be a shame to miss out on coordinating with the flowers.
And occupy the empty halls
One headliner, Michael Franti, met with members of the gay rights group OutFront.org and pledged his support to them, here.
Finely shred the cabbage and put it on the side. In a pan, darken the ground beef with salt and pepper. Add the tomato paste and a cup of water. Mix together for a couple of minutes. Add the shredded cabbage to the pan. The heat will make it tender. Make sure to mix the meat and cabbage well. If you need more water, go ahead and add it until everything in the pan is evenly flavored and cooked.
And by atheist, I don't mean that I'm fond of Madelyn Murray O'Hair (who, from what I hear from people who actually encountered her, was a real bitch), or any of those wankers on public access TV who feel like that they need to demean anyone who believes in G-d, or a higher power, or whatever. I worked for a major Christian denomination for several years, and in the course of that employment I met plenty of people who were exceedingly rational and exceedingly sane and occasionally fun to be with, and they believed in something. Not the Bible as literal fact, not even the Bible as figurative story, but in something larger than themselves that tied the universe together.
Konichiwa! I’m here in Japan, and it’s officially 9:00pm, which I believe means that means it’s 9am on the east coast… so good morning from the future. Today was lovely and I hope you have the same great weather that I had today!
Open your heart and things happen.
But, there's something awesome about doing a muscle up, even if I am getting WAY too much help. It's one of those "holy shit this move could actually save my life" type things. Straight up functional. Not frequently functional, but I can imagine scenarios (even ones that don't involve zombies) where being able to pull myself from a dead hand up over whatever ledge I'm gripping, yeah. Awesome. Maybe some day I'll be able to do one of those on my own. To be fair, probably not. But it would be wicked.
1) Shame – There is always something else. There is always something more. We will never be able to do it all. If you are competitive and ambitious like me you will end up driving yourself crazy trying to become the most spiritually disciplined person around.
Remember being lost, being apathetic, and taking a stroll in the denial land?
Where the vision is bright as spring.
Also supporting the rally was City Council Member Tony Avella, a maverick candidate for mayor. Present but not speaking were three candidates for Bill de Blasio’s City Council seat, Josh Skaller, Craig Hammerman, and Brad Lander, as well as Joanne Simon, a candidate for Yassky’s seat.
Your BlackBerry Curve 3G helps make an excellent solution for specialists or just those who wish to use his or her mobile phone to keep organized along with interested about the transfer.
If your nutrition is off track, start by taking away one unhealthy food once a week and replacing it with a healthy food.
Back to like, now though.
09 ROTWANG PURSUES MARIA Part 2 (Giorgio Moroder) 2'33
The Krylon Clear Choice Art Scholarships will award five $1,000
To start, we enjoyed a smooth, creamy cauliflower and blue cheese soup. Daisy had also lightly pickled some mixed fruit and vegetables for dropping into the soup as a garnish. The soup was delicious and I really liked the juicy little cubes of flavour provided by the pickle.
Took a scenic route, saw a rusty old Ford car (I mean close to the original) with a cow skull attached to the grille…
Even though I've missed the last couple of opportunities to post, I love the 2nd Tuesday of each month, when I -- and other bookloving moms -- post the tried-and-true recommendations of what their kids have liked over in 5 Minutes for Books' Kids' Picks.
Things are also happening fast now. There is so much work (…and so much weeding… oi) that there is no way I’m going to able to put together a big post for each thing, and catch you all up. Therefore, I’ve come up with a solution. For the next few weeks, I will update this blog each time I visit the garden. The posts won’t be as long as many of my others, but when put together, should tell the whole story.
Junkie XL Saturday teenage kick NL
BM: Thanks Lucy, for dropping by and sharing your insights with us.
I had to forget something crucial when I was packing, didn't I? Toothpaste, that's what. On Saturday morning, I told someone in passing that I'd forgotten mine and had had to use soup (bleurgh). An hour or so later, Jeremy Guy, one of the extraordinary team of organisers, came up to me and said he'd heard I'd forgotten my toothpaste and I really should have told him.
same courses, different schedule - and my mom says i can sleep over on monday nights at their house.
band: Who was it?
We usually think of quinoa as a grain, but it is actually the seed of a plant with the scientific name Chenopodium quinoa. Not only is quinoa high in protein, but the protein it supplies is a complete protein, meaning that it includes all nine essential amino acids. Not only is quinoa’s amino acid profile well-balanced, making it a good choice for vegans concerned about adequate protein intake, but quinoa is especially well-endowed with the amino acid lysine, which is essential for tissue growth and repair. In addition to protein, quinoa features a host of other health-building nutrients. Because quinoa is a very good source of manganese as well as a good source of magnesium, folate, and phosphorus, this “grain” may be especially valuable for persons with migraine headaches, diabetes and atherosclerosis. There are many other health benefits that quinoa offers including helping with the prevention of cardiovascular disease, cancer, diabetes, gallstones, and childhood asthma as well as increasing antioxidant protection.
Hi Everyone! I have retreated to the Worleybird Studio. I am being terrorized by a mouse. He attacked me as I was putting away my groceries. My vicious watch dog, Jack, was no help at all. He was up the stairs faster than I was! As instructed by my fearless husband, I have laid out some tasty peanut butter in a trap and made myself scarce so that said mouse can begin his feast. Why, oh why, did Mickey have to choose MY house? I'm certain my neighbors' houses are much more comfy!!!!
muka bogel takde eyeliner pun dah rasa resah. dapat gambar photoshoot, rasa bangga sampai upload merata-rata (blog, tumblr, facebook, twitter, etc) expecting people to tell you how good you're looking. parallel to that, jadi riak, and riak is salah satu attributes yang Allah SWT hina.
The things I couldn't get around were:
In the mean time, today I wanted to recap all the fun that happened here at The Shabby Nest during February.
mportant discussions. =0ANow, a little bit about me. I have been a Bible-be=
shadows behind their knees
So without further ado..............DRUM ROLL.............
"Ready. Backblast clear. Firing." Medina said. The missile jumped forward a few meters, lept into the sky, flew over the hills and ridges, and came crashing down on the enemy position. The guerillas soared over their cover from the blast. One of them came down in two pieces. Another came down headfirst. Even 30 meters away Rodriguez could hear the sickening crack of a fatal breaking of bones.
Hydrocortisone – See Cortisone.
Add rice cakes and cream and let them cook until the sauce gets thicken, stirring occasionally.
8. Adjournment
I feel my weakness and inadequacy all the time.
Have a lovely weekend friends.
“In that case, ma’am, I’d like to call Mr. Hafner and tell him I’m returning you to the White House.”
Are you ready for THE NEWS?
But to cheer us up about not being on a fabulous trip, I thought we could talk about my favorite thing in the whole wide world:
Hope everyone has a wonderful Tuesday!!
Lawrence of Arabia, which was screened on the beach at Cannes just two years ago, will be unveiled in a new print; likewise The Ballad of Narayama, Keisuke Kinoshita’s 1958 drama.
For years and years and a year after that,
You can’t heal a wound by saying it is not there!
While swiggin' in the boozers, I had a chance to read the papers I used to work for (or for whom I used to work, if I was being a pedantic sub) - the Wigan Observer and Wigan Evening Post. Good to see Richard Bean's by-line still in there. Beano is one of those tremendous characters who has two modes - joking or ranting - and a vast cast of contacts to help him get the nitty-gritty stories which make Wigan tick.
Push Girls, which will air on the Sundance Channel in April, follows the personal lives of four wheelchair-bound women as they negotiate familiar struggles from motherhood to relationship break-ups.
1925-1955 Special Handling 10 cents
Now steady on, it gets more difficult now… Shred your spring greens, chop your chilli and lightly fry for about 2 to 3 mins.
The airline said it is seeking advice to challenge the ruling.
The sketch called for a sentiment on an oval in the lower right corner but because I already had the sentiment in the photo, I cut out a star, pen stitched in the centre to mimic the background, and attached it with glue dots for some dimension. The glue dots are white but they show a wee bit so I coloured them blue with a TomBow marker.
Attending a successful networking events coincides with a successful business.
It’s the other bit that’s tricky, getting ‘em going again. You gotta poke the embers and keep poking and bellowing just as hard as you can, even if all you see is the tiniest prick of light. You let ‘em die, you don’t sleep for a week.
That’s how Samplify CTO and founder Al Wegener opened last week’s presentation to the Santa Clara Chapter of the IEEE Computer Society. Wegener’s company specializes in data compression, which happens to be a way to get more bandwidth out of your existing memory and memory interfaces. But before he cranked up his memory-compression sales pitch, Wegener covered a lot of useful ground that every SoC designer needs to know.
In other news, this baby is coming any day now so I will be taking a brief maternity leave from The Daily Connoisseur. I look forward to returning to the blog and videos, newly inspired and with a whole new perspective on life…
You know, usually I go for the bad guys, but Jack was just too sweet to resist! Reading about him just made me want to melt into a pile of warm mush. I cannot explain how much I am in love with him right now..! His love for Nikki is heartbreaking. He loves her so much that it hurts, it physically hurts, and for her to be gone months, for him to lose her, I can't even imagine... My heart shatters for him. I wanted to reach in and take away his pain, hug him and hold him♥
212.525.6099
I drove to the University of Tennessee's arboretum, where I walked and shot with the Nikon - the sun was that perfect morning golden. I haven't uploaded any of those pictures, so I don't know what I've got on my big girl camera yet.
Because I started playing in this period of transition between generations, I often don't feel I belong to either one. I wasn't a wargamer nor was I old enough to hang out with the high schoolers, but I was enough old enough to look down my nose at the "kiddies" whose first exposure to RPGs with either the Moldvay or (worse) Mentzer boxed sets (even though I owned and adored the former -- and still do). And while the Holmes Blue Book does get a lot of love in the old school world these days, that's a comparatively new development. For the most of my time in the hobby, the Holmes edit was the "forgotten" edition of D&D, particularly once the hobby expanded greatly as the Moldvay and Mentzer devotees entered it.
ULTRAMAN TIGA debuts on Japan’s MBS network. This series marked a new beginning to the Ultraman saga featuring updated special effects and a whole new take on the familiar Ultraman mythology. A new series followed nearly every year including Ultraman Gaia, Ultraman Cosmos and Ultraman Nexus.
So I was in the Crafty mood today. I finally was able to do some sewing that I miss so much. Heres what I made today:
### fastcompany.com January 26, 2010
"I am from Milan," he continued through the wound down window, "I have just been to a fashion show in London and have some samples that I don't want to take back to Italy. I have to pay extra baggage charges. I'm in the fashion business and would like to give them to you as a gift."
Now overbearing music, especially that with a repetitive bass beat driving through your skull is a pet peeve of mine (they seem very keen on that in London and I do mean you the Dispensary)) and one such incident - admittedly not involving repetitive bass - happened to me and E a couple of Saturdays ago, around tea time. We were in the City Arms in Manchester centre - a very traditional pub - and went in the back room. It was a mixed company from young to old, but you had to shout to make yourself heard above the piped music. We drank up and fled, not because we couldn't discuss the finer points of the ale, but because we couldn't talk without raising our voices. Pub music is always divisive and there isn't really a simple test for those inflicting it, though I think they should ask two basic questions. Firstly am I putting this on for me, or for my customers and secondly, is at a reasonable volume and appropriate to the recipients?
Spend a day at Raley Field and help benefit the California Volunteer Movement, Sacramento Food Bank and Family Services, Sacramento Boys and Girls Clubs, Omni Youth Programs, Susan G. Komen Foundation, A Touch of Understanding and more. There will be live music, local celebrities, entertainment, food and beverages.
"Because there is a law such as gravity, the universe can and will create itself from nothing. Spontaneous creation is the reason there is something rather than nothing, why the universe exists, why we exist," Hawking writes.
So here is a relatively new CEO authorising ‘cover-up’ out of Court payments to a high-profile hacking victim three months after taking up his role, but he has no knowledge at all of a key legal opinion suggesting a lack of Newscorp criminality (beyond lone rogue Clive Goodman) in the case of the Royal phone-hacks. That sounds like gross dereliction to me. It also sounds like a masochist who only ever wants to know the bad news.
Purity at its finest as I peel back layer after layer just for you to understand.
So a Wedding Card to start with. Just love this one for it's simplicity. .. I find the clean and simple cards so difficult to do, so having managed to do this made me feel so good.
today to always spend quality time speaking in tongues; its benefits are
"I saw your schedule, Austin. Yes, you are," I said trying to decide if he was pulling my leg or if he really believed he was in regular classes. "Why do you think you're in regular classes?" I asked.
Depression is one hell of a battle. It doesn’t matter how many time one goes through it, or how long one is depressed, every time one finds themselves in this postion, it becomes a mind over matter to get out of it. At least in my situation. I have delt with depression as long as I can remember, but with me, I have extremes. My happy times are very joyful and at high levles; my sad times are bad and long winded. But the way I bounce back and forth between the two extreams is odd. But that’s not my point or least why I decided to start writing this morning……………
Add 1 tablespoon of shredded chicken and as much cheese as desired to the inside of the tortilla (make sure not to overstuff the tortilla, this will make it hard to roll the tortilla up.)
Memories or moments that haunt my dreams,
If you're anything at all like me, you have a stack of fabric scraps from projects past. Beautiful, wonderful, colorful fabrics that make you feel happy and full just looking at them. Come on, now. I know you do!
So endeth the home season at Tri-City and already a touch of homesickness is being felt.
Eventually, through the perseverance of people like Chong, the British Government relented and agreed to hear the case.
A simple mental calculation on my part told me that the two revised bills did not add up to the amount on the original bill.
my heart has risen
Publisher Wheaton, Ill. : Tyndale House Pub., c1991.
Without further ado, the movie trailer for PRIEST:
I can’t get into specifics yet, so consider this one of those “Unspoken” requests. But the earth shifted beneath our feet last Sunday night and this past week has been a roller-coaster of emotions.
A Cricut Cartridge! I love adding paper cuts from my Cricut to my cards. It's just a nice final touch that often brings everything together on the card or adds a little fun to it.
Netherwing rep is somewhat time consuming to get. First you need to complete all the quests in Shadowmoon Valley that relate to the Netherwing. Then there are dailies. The number of dailies you can do increases as your reputation increases. Finally, you can farm the rare spawn eggs and hand in as many of these as you can find a day. They are located all over the Netherwing daily area and in the fortress to the north. Once you are Exalted you will be given a quest to go to Shattrath where you can select one of the drakes. You then go back to Shadowmoon Valley where you can buy the rest.
On Lily Sanderson’s eighteenth birthday she’ll become just a girl—still a mer girl, true, but signing the renunciation paperwork will ink Princess Waterlily of Thalassinia out of existence. That leaves plain old Lily living on land, dating the boy she loves, and trying to master this being human thing once and for all.
Failure by Bernanke to mention QE3 on Wednesday may dampen bullish hopes in that regard but I’d never presume to know what the Fed might do, having been proven wrong in the past. There’s a reason we are told to not “fight the Fed.” Yet, how they can put QE3 back on the table in the midst of potential political change in Europe that could change things in ways not imagined.
On the tweetspeak poetry blog a group of people led by Lyla Lindquist have just begun discussing L.L. Barkat’s book Rumors of Water. I bought this book about 6 months ago and have already read it twice, which should serve as recommendation enough since I rarely read books more than once unless I am studying them.
“No, really. It’s perfect. Great job! Thanks, honey!”
“God loves you. He wants to have an intimate relationship with you. He wants you to learn to hear His voice and know His will. Your relationship to Him is the key to hearing when God speaks to you.” (pg. 38, Experiencing God workbook, Henry T. Blackaby and Claude v. King; Lifeway Press: Nashville, TN, 1997)
How will you be able to judge the taste, education, enthusiasms and background of a person whose home you enter if the day ever comes when you can't browse their bookshelves? What will happen to judging a person by the books they keep? You can't very well ask to look at their Kindle index, can you?
We are home from a wonderful Utopia weekend. In fact wonderful doesn’t even begin to describe it………it was fabulous, relaxing, beautiful, romantic, hysterically funny, energizing, beautiful, fabulous weekend. Utopia really lived up to its name. It was simply utopia.
Egypt has threatened legal action and said it will not sacrifice a drop of its historic entitlement. Yet a new Ethiopian hydroelectric dam, which opened last month, further emphasises Egypt’s diminishing control over the river that is its lifeblood.
A north-facing conservatory needs good heating while a south-facing one needs ventilation and shade. By investing in a high performance glass which minimises heat loss and in a heating system which has low running costs, you can ensure that your DIY conservatory is a comfortable space to use during the cold days. Moreover, for the hottest summer days, windows on either sides and roof vents will allow a breeze to flow through the space.
information on how much money they had spent on patenting their inventions and how much money they had earned in revenues from licensing their patents. While CSIR disclosed the amount of money that they had spent on patenting, they refused to disclose their revenues from the licensing of their patents. This denial was made on two grounds:
- TGWD
Cut them up to chunks along with other ingredients.
Where were they going? What would become of them?
Now the candles were lighted. What dazzling splendor! What a blaze of light! The tree quivered so in every bough that a candle set one of its twigs ablaze. It hurt terribly.
For someone who's goal in life is to have simple, relaxed days, I've had quite the crazy month. I guess it started with the rush to get our bedroom finished then I jumped straight into making Christmas presents, having to spend time at the doctor's with my sister the week coming up to Christmas (she had a crazy infected spot and bandage had to be changed every day by the doctor with a wait time of a couple hours each day). Then it was Christmas, 2 days of rest, a visit to Montreal, spent the next day visiting Yen's Dad, the day after that visiting his brother, THEN I was sick for a week AND THEN we had my niece and nephew over for the weekend (while still a little sick, but that's ok, they're the ones who gave it to me :/).
Square
So go get the book (thanks Boston Public Library – you are the main reason I’m lukewarm-ingly happy to pay state taxes), make sure your room is chilly enough to warrant a blanket and dark enough to need a lamp, and read this with a mug of warm, milky tea. You could also read it on your private beach in St. John and be totally immersed while earning my contempt, but if we’re going to set the perfect reading environment, get thee to some northern environ and snuggle up.
There are enormous numbers of people needing affordable housing in the UK generally, and in London in particular. I work in the sector. If this housing is not provided we end up with homelessness, overcrowding, poverty, and despair.
OK, here goes.
Her Brownies were so much better than mine.
Red chilly Powder-to Taste
Wait… isn’t this supposed to be for kids?
6. Upon his return from daycare one day this week, Cody came marching into the house with the strap of his lunchbox slung over his shoulder and announced, "Look, Mommy! I'm 'tarrying' my lunchbox like Daddy 'tarries' his purse!". Daddy prefers to call to his purse his briefcase.
I look at the skies and they are so blue & vast & inspirational & then suddenly I have a feeling of being trapped inside this vast universe & I think what a perfectly crafted design driven by purpose & logic to manipulate humans by hiding the truth from them. But there’s more to this world than just purpose & logic.
David Chawngthu
I woke up in the wee hours of the morning to two dreadful problems: 1) the power and therefore the fan had gone off and 2) that horrible sound of a mosquito doing a dive bomb past my ear. ArGH!
Surely this shows how self-absorbed we tend to be as Americans and how little we care about poverty. Often, though we won’t say certain things, our actions say those same things far more powerfully. We might not say that we don’t care about poverty. We certainly aren’t willing to say, “Let the children starve,” but our actions show that, functionally, that’s exactly how we feel.
You can buy them online...they are on sale through the summer - Buy 3 Get 1 Free!
Most sales reps just focus on activity since that is what the boss is most concerned with (in reality the boss is concerned with a lot of things but especially the lack of contracts).
When you give yourself away
Miramonte Elementary School teachers who were removed from their classrooms during the investigation into two teachers arrested for misconduct will speak publicly on Thursday, after nearly three months of silence.
Ten people in America might get that (although legendary comedy writer Jerry Belson used to say, “ten is enough.”)
I never thought that it would dawn on me
Ben still needs money to avoid layoffs so he goes back to the loan shark that Mike got rid of last week. The guy tells him not to miss a payment and then makes a not so veiled threat toward Renee. So much for Ben being a good guy.
diuretic tea recipe for bloating and excess water:
Quickly, she grabs her keys, takes her handbag with her suitcase with her and goes out, slamming the door behind leaving only the sound of her fading footsteps behind her.
I have copies of your birth certificates, pictures of me holding you as a baby, one of which is here on this blog & your Grandmother who was a witness of your birth because she helped to deliver you along with Dr Claire in the Canadian Hospital Al Waha - The Oasis on Novermber 14th 2009 at 11:58 pm along with your hospital tags with mine name and your father's name on them.
The socialist, indeed often Marxist, timbre of (early) National Socialism was almost complete. For example, all party members, both male and female, were referred to as ‘comrades’. Again, it may seem cynical, but only because we see it from the prism of SWP (and other) Leftist propaganda which deny all these real similarities of detail and of ideology. Hitler, therefore, admits again that he’s after the communists. He wanted to appeal to the ‘class-conscious proletarians’ (another Marxist term) who fought against the ‘monarchist, reactionary agitation with the fists of the proletariat’. Again, Hitler was not attempting to hoodwink the real socialists, or communists, but to convince them that socialism and nationalism are a happy duo.
He knew I wasn't misdirecting my compliment. "You too," he said and sighed deeply.
9) Skip hotels altogether. Since we’re at it, for those who can do away with the frills of a hotel and have moved beyond hostel accommodation with shared bathrooms (yes, been there, done that, never more), consider staying in accommodation provided by locals. There’s CouchSurfing which is essentially a hospitality exchange network. Sign up, provide information on accommodation that one can provide (if any) and look for available couches in cities that you want to visit. It’s free but not necessarily possibly if you are travelling as a couple or with a group of friends. An alternative is Airbnb (my preferred option) which is a global network of accommodations offered by locals. It’s relatively affordable and one can find decent rooms or apartments in central locations \. I’ve used this for my recent trip with my family to Amsterdam and stayed in a very cosy apartment.
This post has to do with fashion. A first for this blog? A fashion faux pas.
The tag line should come at the end of a TV ad.
So much for a relaxing couple of weeks - I'm really ready for a bit less drama now, it's been a rough few months, and I think we're all longing to just relax for a while. We've also been talking about whether the night time call from the man from the water board was an omen - was it a warning that this was going to happen, or is this a second (or third, if you count the Littlest Hobo's adventure into the chest deep sea as one too) warning, or the thing that we were being warned about? Ugh, it's a nerve-racking business, all this!
The applicant should indicate the difference of the subject -matter of the new claim vis- a- vis the state of the art and the significance thereof, i.e., which is the underlying technical problern that is solved in an inventive way by those features of the independent claim that form a contribution over the prior art (e.g. D1 ). ln the Ietter of reply, the applicant is requested to apply the problem-solution approach for inventive step as outlined in the Guidelines CIV 11.5, i.e. the applicant is requested to
It was fine. It was better than fine. It was so much fun I might even write a race report.
Following is the SongFest 2012 concert schedule. All concerts are free and open to the public. Updated concert and class information can be found at www.songfest.us.
Part 3: Isaiah 53 and Practical Theology
I’d also like to find a local source for maple or berry syrups. Then again, I might just go to a u-pick and make my own.
15 Worst Thing You Can Do (For A Living)
I recall a sergeant, formerly in the airborne, who told me, “In the airborne they first separate the men from the boys. Then they separate the boys from the idiots. And then the idiots make their first jump.” Life is easier if you can laugh at yourself. I did not join the airborne, but rather spent my time in an engineer battalion, part of an infantry division, assigned to the intelligence section. To those who still question my intelligence to this day, I say nah-nah-nah-nah-nah!
I remember a time when I was pretty small that she made corsages of violets. She would drive out on the rural roads and pick the violets. Then she would bring them home and bunch them and dip them in a preserving wax and pretty them up with bows. Then she would drive the long distance to a well-known ballroom dancing hall and there, on the street outside, would sell the tiny bouquets to the gentlemen for their ladies. (She did not know it then, but many years later she would be one of those ladies.)
Slow Cooker Southwestern Stuffed Peppers
As I drove toward home last week, I feared I had made a wrong turn and somehow ended up in Juarez, Mexico. Lying in the gutter, just across the street from my house, appeared to be a lifeless corpse.
8. Fracking is too destructive to be permitted at all but it certainly should not be permitted without significant protections not now in place or proposed, including:
We were just heading outside to play and Duck says to me "its freezing outside it's 30:10, and that's a lot of money!" lol I think we need to work on time, measurement, and money a bit more, he seems confused ......lol!
Not one of Chef Daniele Scelza’s dishes comes across as pretentious or boastful. The techniques employed in terms of design and execution are obviously gifted, and that makes the accessibility of the experience that much more impressive. Sitting at the chef’s table was also a joy; food nerds that we are, we love the opportunity to further connect with what’s on our plate.
I've never used the volume conditioner, but the reviews are awesome. Definitely going to ask the folks at Van Michael about this. Sounds AAAAmazing, like everything else Aveda.
Not surprisingly, “Prominent health warnings on all containers” topped the poll, with “Extension of duty escalator” second and “Minimum price escalator”, “Further high-strength duties” and “Ban on television advertising” following closely behind. It is maybe surprising that there has been little movement on advertising restrictions so far. Perhaps the health establishment realise that advertising doesn’t really boost overall consumption, although curbs would undoubtedly advance the “denormalisation” message. And remember, beer geeks, that the more advertising and promotion is restricted, the harder it becomes to launch new products into the market.
But this year, I have learnt something new.
As far as life on other planets, the possible self-destruction of other earths…these are questions that just don’t matter to me. I am far too limited to try to figure out everything God knows. True science has never contradicted God’s word. I do not fear scientific exploration; in fact, I welcome it.
He Broke his Word, and Lost some Face.
“Thank you, Timna,” Ohobilah said, sitting up as the maid began to plait her hair. She kept staring into her reflection.
Me: Huh?
We used various wovens, and flannel for the top; and swirl minkee, and embossed minkee for the back.
the first day or two of our trip, i was still thinking this was a normal birthday trip, though we were looking for my wedding dress. we shopped hard, and i ended up with a dress that i had seen online and loved. i tried on a handful of dresses while sipping champagne, but kept coming back to the first dress. we stayed at aria for the second time. we love that hotel. and the pool.
He used his plays and books as "alchemic texts" to ensnare and mesmerize Sylvia and her vulnerable sons, as well as Daphne DuMaurier and her handsome and shallow father Gerald DuMaurier. This was apparently done by Barrie's imagining what he wanted his targets to become (inspired by the works of George DuMaurier, even though there is no evidence that the two authors met -- although Dudgeon thinks they did and says so repeatedly) and then writing them into his plays and novels, thus gaining power over them: "Theatre-goers lapped up his supernatural plays, but never quite understood why," Dudgeon claims, even though he states in a later chapter that Peter Pan is the one work by Barrie that has endured. Are we to gather by this that only early-twentieth-century audiences were susceptible to Barrie's demonic machinations?
*Our big plans to have executed our move to a bigger apartment by the time Bobbie was born? Ha. We're still slogging along waiting for news from the coop board. We've figured out interim plans, and plans B, C, and D for if we don't get the apartment, so we'll be okay. But there were some tense days in there, let me tell you.
I was able to meet some great people. Not only the costumed masses, (above was a couple completely covered in denim) but was able to network with some of the brewers competing at the event. Pedro and Seneca Gonzalez, the owner/brewers of New Planet were probably some of the nicest people I have ever met. Pedro being extremely sensitive to gluten, left his former life as a non-profit accountant to live his dream of brewing great beer for the people who share his love of beer but cannot drink it. Not even a year in they have grown greatly. Not too long ago they were selling the beer out of the back of his truck but now have established themselves with a local distributor and are growing greatly in this region. As I can attest to, good things happen to great people. Pedro and Seneca walked away with a Bronze medal for their 3R Raspberry Ale in the Gluten Free category. The most amazing part is this beer was only released to the public in the last few months. I am excited to try to gluten free pale ale they were telling me about; it is being developed and will be released shortly.
1-tablespoon fresh lemon juice
But where does a title come from? I drove back from St Albans today trying to think of three Vampire Dawn titles. I think the process went like this: 'Think of words associated with death: dead, death, cemetery, graveyard, coffin, winding-sheet, shroud - ah, weren't vampires once called shroud-eaters? This is for new vampires, so...'
Spin by Catherine McKenzie. "The tag line is: ‘How far would you go to get what you always wanted?’ and Kate Sandford, protagonist of Catherine McKenzie's first novel, Spin, goes so far she makes you cringe. … Where A Million Little Pieces … was tortured and powerful, Spin is more about entertainment and fun. … Full of pop-culture allusions, some really funny ones. … Spin is a compelling, fast-paced read.” – The Globe and Mail
But I’m not afraid
“You can, and you will with your head held high,” he told me. “I didn’t see any of them out in the show ring with a bucking bronco. Now get back on this horse and show her who the boss is.”
If you still doubt the existence of the Illuminati brotherhood take note, positive or negative, to George Washington:
There was some comment about the bad behavior. But what really upset the Canadians was that the Canadian players were sipping American suds.
This is something else amazing that popped up near our house this year:
Saturday night I was booked to do one of my favourite bars (in another hotel) with Tat2 (the 2-piece outfit). But turns out they put us entertaining a Christmas party in the function room! This pissed me off 'cos they should really have booked a full band for this, cheapskates, and not only did they get us for WAY CHEAPER, but the 2 piece is more of a pub gig, and we really had to pull out all the stops to keep a dance set going for the whole night. Then again, just shows what a lad can do under pressure, and still smile and make folk laugh, and dance.
A temporary loss of muscle and nerve function following childbirth may make Kegels more difficult. Kegel exercises do not work if abdominal, thigh, or buttock muscles are contracted.
I started this just to keep track of my progress. I'd put the Chapter Number, Chapter Name and word count in a spreadsheet and have it add up my word count so I could see where I was in the book.
I actually thought the whole thing was pretty funny at the time. Especially as we moaned and groaned every time she said, “now stand there and smile”. But she was completely devastated. It wasn’t until I went on a trip to America years later with my friend and ended up losing 5 rolls of film that I understood what she went through. I was totally inconsolable at the time.
my goal is to update twice a wk with pictures of out adventures and the food we have created together .
It took me close to three minutes to fold one crane. I need to practice more.
For wool clothing I use:
/opt/VRTS/docs/vxfs_ag.pdf
We’d been here often, perhaps daily at times, and at least once or twice a week, for many months. That there were days we left without having our walk because of all the cars overcrowding the little arc-shaped slip of a parking lot seemed to reinforce that this was a safe and well-inhabited spot. Jamoka loved to walk out onto the sun-warmed rocks and down into the water where they made a little ramp, and then he’d lie in the sun and dry off, after first doggie-shaking off the excess water followed by that little butt-only wiggle-flourish he’d do and I’d laugh out loud every time. On the way down the path I’d throw sticks I’d collected along the trail and he’d gleefully run for them, tongue flying, through the woods and over downed trees, ultimately diving into the river and doggie-paddling triumphantly back with the stick held aloft in his mouth. I’d wade around up to my knees collecting and throwing the sticks that he’d drop just shy of dry land and then we’d sit and watch the dusk gather unto itself and start the uphill walk back to the car before the dusk actually began it’s show.
must use a High Hope image on your
What we’re left with are guzzled down
I could agonize over a clever, insightful and introspective way to start this blog, but really that would just give me more reason to procrastinate getting started...which has been my M.O. for this whole decorating thing for far too long.
So, if you've sent me an email, or an assignment, to my Writers Bureau email address, and not had a response it's because I haven't been able to get into it yet! I hope this will be rectified next week, but please bear in mind that I may have several assignments to mark, so it may take a few more days to get back to you.
Amongst the reasons for the delays were a Tory government deeply committed to defending the police from criticism no matter how valid; we had to wait until the Blair government before a proper inquiry was launched.
This year I don’t mind
It will come as no surprise
We installed a large section of peg board on the left side to use hooks and shelves to hold all kinds of accessories, holsters, books, DVDs, and other odds-n-ends. Our mobile reloading bench and with accessories and some ammunition storage are parked over there too.
I spent much time in the Word where He confirmed over and over what He told me here. Goodness I am overwhelmed with Joy and Peace, no more analyzing the back-up plan.
6. There is no good independent evidence for even the mundane claims about Jesus (such as that he existed)
4: I started to look into other sorts of carrier, and fancied myself a woven wrap for a change. I did a lot of research into the different brands, and kept an eye out on the second-hand site. Eventually a Didymos woven wrap came up, and I bought it. Oh it was so pretty! And out of all the slings I have owned it was by far the most comfortable. I loved it. It took me a while to get the hang of fastening it, and I never mastered a back carry. But when I used it for a front-carry it was like walking without carrying a baby.
When police arrived, they asked John C. Hibbitts, 58, what he was doing. He said, "It's OK. I'm a nudist. It's hot out," according to the report.
The sun is shining brightly
And be advised that if you’re standing behind me in line at the checkout counter at the Market On Yates, I’ll be doing the “old lady thing.” Oh, yes. I’ll dig into my change purse like a National Enquirer reporter digs for dirt on Lindsay Lohan, and I won’t stop digging until I find the exact change for my purchase. Right down to the very…last…penny. By the time I’m through counting coppers, that loaf of bread in your basket will be as stale as a Bob Hope joke.
Saturday is a good day to visit
But, the state government too does not appear to be serious. For, it has not even been able to utilise the allocated Rs 10 crore so far. The Forest Department officials blame lack of open land for their going slow on afforestation. They say they were planting saplings on whatever open land they found in schools, colleges or villages.
The effect you have on me… is why I find you irresistible.
This is because the campaign itself was bogus. It purported that the Coniston was worth saving because it was the only hotel in Sittingbourne. This was untrue and everyone knew it. Added to this was the fact that the Coniston had been on its last legs for years.
I listen to music. A lot. Almost all the time. There’s rarely a moment when I don’t have my earphones plugged in, or the loudspeaker is not playing something. There is something playing around me all the time. What do I listen to? Almost everything. When people ask me this question, I usually answer with techno, electronica, trance, trip-hop, that stuff. But when I sit and really reflect on that question, or rather simply look at my music folder on the computer, I realize, I really listen to anything and everything. Okay, may be not everything, but close to everything. I can’t stand metal, of any sort, the harder, the worse, so that is struck off. Rock, I listen to the not so popular bands, save Coldplay and U2. U2 also, I haven’t heard all the songs, although I procured the entire discography. Floyd and The Doors and all the classic rock bands I haven’t heard; Floyd I just can’t seem to appreciate. Puts me to sleep, sorry about that.
This final footage was time-stamped 21:37, April 23, 2013, as good a moment as any other to mark the start of the open warfare that erupted across the entire country as word of the battle spread.
The President of the United States of America, Barack Hussein Obama, has generated so much fear that the most common theme of posted comments and private communications is that he will refuse to relinquish power if defeated in November or that, under some pretext, he will declare a state of martial law.
if any of these mean anything to you, let me know:
CAIR officials have no problem routinely appearing on Press TV, Iran's state-controlled English-language outlet, to criticize American treatment of Muslims.
Day 4—Stupid Bonding Activities
This poem I wrote after a long night of talking but with a heavy heart of thinking. It was a very dark poem which was the personification of what I was feeling at that moment… nothing. This was my best way to describe my inner turmoil and lack of hope for the future.
We apologize for any inconveniences.
Copyright © 2011-2012 Denise Le Fay. All Rights Reserved. You may copy and redistribute this material so long as you do not alter it in any way and the content remains complete, credit is given to the author, and you include this copyright notice and link. http://deniselefay.wordpress.com/
Glowed on the marble, where the glass
It seems that 20% of the students are Muslim, and the Prof is using the excuse of "cultural sensitivity" to promote his own personal belief (as stated in his speech) that he " was not a great fan of alcohol on campus".
DIABLO 3
When blood flow is completely blocked to the heart, ischemia can lead to a heart attack. Ischemia can be silent or symptomatic. According to the American Heart Association, up to four million Americans may have silent ischemia and be at high risk of having a heart attack with no warning.
One of the least known aspects of the GE Bt brinjal is its ability to cross with wild relatives or cultivated varieties. This is because there are no recent reviews in the scientific literature concerning species related to brinjal, and where they grow across Asia. This information is vital when addressing concerns regarding cultivation of GE Bt brinjal, because insect-resistance gives a selective advantage to the plant, increasing its ability to survive and reproduce. If the GE Bt brinjal cross-pollinates wild, weedy or cultivated relatives, the result is a hybrid offspring, which may grow more aggressively and thus become a problem weed, the report says.
Although university officials moved swiftly to give the assurance that the resolution would not derail work to set up the Yale-NUS College next year, the resolution did incense many in Singapore who saw it as belittling Singapore’s achievements as a nation.
You can always tell the newbies. So gung ho with everything. First flake falls and they go into raptures of Oohs and Aahs. And then they are out- trotting with the shovel and salt.
Perhaps I am too close to this situation to see her clearly. I don’t see the same little girl others see–at school, church, and at friends’ houses. She gets good reports from all such places. What I see is a lost little girl. I see a little girl who rarely has a sense of peace and general well-being. I see a little girl who is lacking connection/grounded-ness. So the opinions of others regarding her are true? . . . or my assessment of her is true? I can’t tell.
Whole Lotta Love - Soundboard Recording
My Gertz clone was a real trooper; she came, squirted, cuddled and left with a nice spank on the ass. As for me, well I was completely spent and worried about round two with the teen sensation across the street. I popped two “Yohimbe” pills and washed them down with an energy drink. Sparking up a joint while I took a shit, I decided it would be in my best interest to jerk off one more time. As I was sitting there, I noticed I may need a trim in the cock area. This younger generation was all into being smooth and hairless.
The curl of my lips.
Before Christmas in an application concerning AIB, it was only at the last moment that journalists at the Irish Times learned that there was to be a hearing and legged it over to the High Court just in time to catch the government’s legal team entering the court to seek directions in relation to AIB. The government demanded the exclusion of the journalists and others, and its demand was acquiesced to, and the hearing was subsequently held in camera. The February High Court hearing saw lawyers on behalf of the Irish Times and RTE turn up to press their rights to report the hearing and the hearing was heard in open court. Few details were given though as to how the government was to going to sell an important chunk of property in 100% State-owned financial institutions. It emerged that bidders had to sign confidentiality agreements before being admitted to the auction.
Only 2 things survived, the 2 Hasselblads.
“No way,” protested the angel on my shoulder (would that be my mother? Or my daughter?) “You need to introduce yourself and explain, not just drive away!”
It is regrettable that in view of Guan Eng’s dodging of every question from the floor or from that of the MCA President, DAP has thence shifted blame to MCA to divert attention away and help their Secretary General escape the embarrassment of being unable to reply the questions.
Here's the thing. My goal weight is 130. It's a weight I look really good at. However, it's kind of hard for me to get to/maintain it. So I've realized that I am okay with not being at 130 all year. As long as I'm not above 145, I am still at a very healthy weight, and I still look...decent. This past month I've been wavering between 137 and 141, due to all the holiday treats and scaling back a little on the exercise, and that's been okay. At this time of year I'm just covered in sweaters and pants 24/7 anyway. But I do want to make sure that I am at 130 when the summer starts, and all throughout it, because I want to be able to wear all the stuff I want without worrying about how my body looks. In order to do this I'll make sure to really buckle down on my diet and up the exercise starting in March, so that I'll have plenty of time to hit my goal by summer. Of course this doesn't mean I won't be exercising and eating well the rest of the year, it just means I won't be torturing myself if I don't look perfect.
Before anyone accuses me of being a clean freak….far far far from that. I am momentarily a clean freak. But these television shows give me cause to become one. Given the right timing I can see this happening………”but for the grace of GOD go I!”
A- Oh yes. Back in the early days of my scrapping, when my tools were still limited and I hadn’t yet bought my heat gun, I used to heat my embossing powders in the mini toaster oven that I had. The problem with this approach is that you invariably end up toasting the paper as well! That aside, I completely burnt the adhesive rubon I was using even before the embossing powder could melt, and it came out, well, weird, for want of a better word. In the end, I believe I tossed that as it had gone a funny colour, was neither sticky nor inkable, and completely unsalvageable. I bought a heat gun after that episode.
Melinda Dillon – Mom
by Clement Clarke Moore
ANIMAL FARM REVISITED
“They brought Latinos, African Americans, native Americans, women’s groups — everyone together around this particular issue,” said Jasmyne Cannick, of the Black Media Alliance, who urged the council to pass the resolution.
6 Urubatan
You can choose from either pork or beef. While beef is tastier, it is a bit expensive than pork. If you are on a tight budget, then pork can work too.
330It will be then no crime to gaze on me.
“Holy shit! It’s Mister Fucking Rogers!”
have his wing and she’d have her wing, and they only saw each other at breakfast and dinner functions… this, she could have lived with. But she’d seen the way he looked at her, the way his eyes had roved over the bodice of her dress when he had come to sign the paperwork with her father, the way his old wrinkly hands had lingered far too long at her shoulder and back.
Well, the e-mail I got back from this guy changed me from aggravated to amused in 3.5 nanoseconds. He attacked my character, my dancing abilities, my looks, just about everything he could think of (and all mis-spelled, both Spanish and English. There is something about piss poor spelling and grammar that takes all the bite out of any retort. Turns a pit bull into a toothless daisy in my mind). He even threatened to attack us at the milongas in Buenos Aires, told Sorin that he would "teach him how the portenos really dance in the street". hum....
we're doing, because it doesn't have the same thirds in it that I need for their
I don't have any pictures of this process, obviously, but I did get out to take some of the fjord yesterday when it was freezing over in places.
More than all that, though ... He loved me enough to send His Son... to die an innocent death, while I was still far from Him. He relentlessly chased after not just me, but you... making the ultimate sacrifice and conquering all in the name of
An hour or so was spent learning about this very distinctive region of France. Brittany has a history, culture and unique language that existed long before it became part of the 'Hexagon' that we call our country nowadays. Brittany is now very much part of France. Yet its history as well as geographical position set the region in a world of its own. It was fascinating to discuss the very deep and specific traits of the Breton mentality and traditions. One has to decide to go to Brittany; you don’t simply drive through it on your way South and discover it “by chance”. You have to choose to go there!
I hope that reading the above information was both enjoyable and educational for you. Your learning process should be ongoing--the more you understand about any subject, the more you will be able to share with others.
Hi Guys! A couple of things regarding Pilanesberg, as stated there are only two campsites Manyane & Bakgatla. There are no 4x4 routes in Pilanesberg. Regarding the elephant that turned the car over, if an elephant comes towards you move out of the way, he is bigger than you and knows it too and will therefore bully you. The elephant responsible for the over turning of the car, also overturned a landy on the same day, because the people would not move out of the way after being told to do so by a Park Official. The elephant responsible for all of this was one of the big boys brought in from Kruger in 1998 to help install discipline amongst the younger bulls. He does not just hang out on the road to the right of Manyane gate he moves all over the park. On the day in question he was seen at Bakgatla in the morning and at Manyane in the late afternoon. The cars around him were boxing him in, which happens when the park is busy…. (Full posting here).
We do know what would result from fight that at least, the protagonist, Haruyuki, wouldn’t die, but how he takes up the challenge of this Skull Rider and gets “rid” of him is mysterious. It may be a result from activating the globalnet, which he forgot to turn off when he was asking for his allowance from his mother, but for whatever reason, it’s the fight that I’m after, and I’m really hoping it’s outstanding or the whole concept would be nothing better than the rest of the mediocre series we have these days.
Boeing, which is based in Chicago, said Tuesday that Brazil is Latin America’s fastest-growing commercial aviationmarket. The company anticipates that the country will need to buy more than 1,000 airplanes worth more than $100 billion in the next 20 years.
"Food manufacturers, supermarkets and health experts are to be asked their views on the best way to label the nutritional content of food.
New York City.
OK, I could go on and on, but I run the risk of losing some of those who are starting to get a nagging, uncomfortable feeling. Let’s get rid of the nagging and make sure it is a full-bore deliberate uncomfortable feeling instead, and grade those papers. Get out your red pens, gang.
Currently, the examiners for preliminary examination also allow the modifications as shown in Fig. 2. With regard to such modifications, the examiners for preliminary examination normally acknowledge that the shape of the modified design in the subsequent application has been shown in the design of the first foreign application and that the subsequent application can enjoy the priority of the first foreign application. Further, if the views submitted upon filing of the subsequent application are the same as those of the first foreign application, the applicant may also make the modifications as shown in Fig. 2 in subsequent procedures, and such modifications will not be considered as going beyond the scope of the original application. However, at present, there is no such case happening in the invalidation procedure.
Back to Zac. After it was obvious things with Fred would never pan out, Zac and I began hanging out. However, fresh out of his relationship with Caroline, things moved slowly. All the while, Garrett would continue to call and pursue me, I would get the random IM from Fred, and Zac was too confused to ever really give us a shot.
Port Brewing Older Viscosity; San Marcos, CA, American Strong Ale, 12% abv
bottle of liquid hickory smoke to add just a touch of something different for the farm staff.
The code below illustrates how an application can prompt the user to select a credential alias and grant access to the application. KeyChain will remember this selection such that the same application can save the credential alias selection and have access to the same certificate in future. For example, the Email application for ICS has implemented this feature in its Server Settings screen.
So I say to myself “Not today.”
Lesson 3: What are your talents?
She said she looked all over for tracing paper that won’t rip when it gets wet.
The views were amazing. Waterfalls off in the distance from the melting snow. amazing views of the mountains, etc. As I climbed higher into the mountains, there was snow on the ground and I was getting cold. My shorts and sandals were not getting it done. I also has very little food and was having difficulty keeping my blood sugar up. About an hour from the end of the hike, my sandal sole broke apart. Now it was flapping against the snow and tripping me up. At this point, the pair of hikers past me for good.
Ink: Wild Wasabi, Chocolate Chip
by Michael Dean Odinn Pollock
Knopf, May 15 2012, $24.00
Fact. When it comes to Grace Kelly, it’s not so easy to do.
Now, Henry, Emma, and August are the only people (that we’ve met so far) who can leave Storybrooke whenever they please, so Emma and Henry should not be in any danger right away. What concerns me is the effect this will have on a lonely Mary Margaret and her relationship with an increasingly annoying David. Without Emma or Henry to push them together, will they be more vulnerable to Regina’s attempts to push them away from each other? How will Mary Margaret cope with her best friend leaving town? Of course, that is assuming that Emma and Henry actually manage to leave Storybrooke, something I highly doubt will happen.
After my early childhood experiences of smoky back rooms, shadowy bars, and whiskey in general, I headed into adolescence with a negative attitude towards both alcohol and the establishments that thrived by keeping its customers glasses full of firewater.
2. Remediate – Change it right away. In mind, in body several times.
It is really pointless to read or listen to these speeches made by politicians, for they contain nothing but a clutter of extremely boring carefully chosen politically correct words, which the Online JRank Encyclopedia describes as, “a curious sociolinguistic phenomenon… Generated by attitudes reflecting social sensitivity rather than frankness.”
Here is a nice card of an Anderson. I tend to collect players with that name because it is similar to my last name Andersen. OK so technically its the same name but spelled different. The origin of the name means "Son of Ander" no matter how you spell it or where you come from even if you add a couple of "S"s.
But they are not finished yet. I have never personally ever in my entire life put hot fudge on an ice cream cone, a sundae yes, ice cream cone..no. But in the world of cake pops it looks cute, cute, cute, so it's allowed :) I melted my dark chocolate candy melts in a plastic squeeze bottle and drizzled it onto the pops. If you don't have a squeeze bottle, you could probably drip the chocolate on top with a spoon!
Let the cake cool in the pan for 15 minutes before removing.
A $40+ bill is steep for three sandwich lunches without much appeal. We don't think we'll be going back, despite the lure of the lovely deck setting. Friends have told me dinner is much better. Maybe Chef Manso is more vested in the evening meals, there certainly didn't seem to be a culinary anyone around at lunch time.
The answer, at least for us, is that we wouldn’t, unless we were evacuating. This is the only part of our emergency response plan that involves our version of bug out bags, which we call ready bags and is the only circumstance under which we plan to leave.
BoQ chief executive Stuart Grimshaw said continued economic uncertainty had influenced the bank’s decision to hold back 15 basis points this month.”
5. To be eligible for the prize package, you must complete ALL of the sketches by each of the deadlines AND link your creation to the link system on that month’s sketch post (the first Saturday of the month). Everyone except for SFYTT Sisters are eligible for the prize package, including Designer of the Month and international players.
Level 24: Mastery: +67%, Weapon ATT: +24, Minimum Critical Damage: +12%.
We didn't have a theme established at the time of this socks creation but due to us both feeling the color and then the pattern appeared as water we created a theme for the sock club based around the elements. So what needed to come next?
2. Colorful and Cute.
The eclectic Paperie E-Team is:
bite size fruit mince pies... just warm
Kelly is still looking mannish to me. Still waiting for a penis to flop out from the bottom hem of one of her too-short skirts. Maybe it will happen in Morocco. "Living the American Dream one mistake at a time." Starting with your self-tanning lotion, Oompa?
-I have now met face to face dozens of bloggers from around the world
This is the last of the cards that my auntie ordered, I really ought to get a move on with my own mum's Mother's Day card now! Di's mother-in-law has a horse (or horses, not sure) so that gave me a good excuse to use the lovely Misty from DigiStamp Boutique - I haven't used her for a while, isn't she sweet?
Shadow of Afghanistan strikingly portrays the tragedies of war, hardships of millions of Afghan refugees who fled the country during the Soviet invasion, children who are victim of land mines and Taliban brutality that was Afghanistan’s darkest era of history.
Plot-wise, Collins is as predictable as ever, and just spends her time slaughtering as many characters as possible in order to wring sympathy for Katniss from us. I’m wagering she believes she’s depicting the travesties and agonies of war, but it all comes off as overkill, particularly when she constantly “fades to black” mid-action and then quickly recaps the rest in the next chapter. Things conveniently work out to ensure maximum bloodshed and as, usual, everyone just loves Katniss and wants to protect her. Leading 8 people to certain death by lying about a mission? These honey badgers don’t care, and it’s a good thing, since most of them die before Katniss ultimately fails anyway. Absolutely nothing surprised me, plot-wise: it was the pessimism show, with non-stop dreary events and unhappy endings, couched in more blind devotion to protecting precious Katniss-Sue.
We refer to the 2 letters, one he wrote as an assistant minister instructing the withdrawal of government assistance to a needy farmer, the other he wrote as an state assemblyman claiming to represent all the village folks to dispose off their NCR land and seeking enormous kickbacks in return. (see annexures)
The core itself will squeeze down as small as it possibly can. The laws of quantum physics state that there's only so tight that you can pack mass before all the electron orbitals are essentially touching one another with no room to pack any more in. This state - known as "electron degenerate matter" - is precisely what happens. The result is an incredibly dense, former stellar core roughly the size of the Earth made of this exotic degenerate matter, known as a "white dwarf". It no longer generates its own energy, but it is quite hot - one can think of it a bit like a dying ember from a former campfire. The electron degeneracy pressure keeps it from collapsing further.
IN AN OCEAN OF PRAISE , AND ON THE WINGS OF A SONG
Who knew, and who SHOULD have known, even if they didn’t know?
Jonathon Dare made a mistake six years ago and that was letting Serena leave and tear her reputation apart and regret sets in as she has perished. But six years later Jonathon gets a look at Meg and all he sees is Serena and her subtle gestures. Jonathon sets out to find out who perished on that ship those six years ago and if it wasn’t Serena he knew he had to win her back.
The fact is that we are willing to sacrifice for our jobs because we do love teaching. We know the joys of those moments when we realize that in a small but significant way we have changed the lives of our students. Sometimes it through teaching a fact or equation that opens the door for further understanding for a student. Other times it in sharing a life experience that ensures the child that things really will be Ok. Every once in a while it is having our own lives changed by the sincerity or honesty and caring of one of our pupils.
Create
(Lights out. Anwaar exits.)
(long pause) I can feel myself moving toward it tectonically. Nonfiction will impose necessary limitations, if only in that you don’t want to make everyone you know hate you. If you’re at all interested in human relationships, fiction feels pretty necessarily where you have to go if you want to go all the way.
Housty, I gotta go into town. Yup, I know it’s late. There’s something I gotta do, that’s all. There’s no time to explain, just come here and let me hold you. Now listen good...
1659 English Restoration: A faction of the British Army removed Richard Cromwell as Lord Protector of the Commonwealth.
Congratulations to the Team of International Spellbloggers who will post once a week and give us a look at the styles and trends in their area of the world!
Amma called me to wish, followed by a loudspeaker session with wishes from her students and the neighbours who gathered at home. It was the best gift I could receive for the day. My eyes were filled with tears (khushi ke aasu – tears of happiness) and I responded to their wishes with a thousand thanks. It is on your birthday that you realize of getting older... but not that old to be worried. I grew moustache to create an effect of getting older but friends asked me to remove it as it looks odd and I am not too old to grow it “their comment”.
"That was really something," Dillard said afterwards. "My heart's racing. Not what I expected to happen today."
This past Saturday and Sunday we were able to spend some time with some good friends that we don’t see often enough. Emma and Shaun invited us to dinner over to their house on Saturday evening. We had a great dinner and it was good just to spend time with them again. Cecilia also loved seeing Gage, Emma and Shaun’s two month old little boy. She wanted to play with him, but Gage isn’t quite old enough yet. Instead she was more interested in his “lion” feet on his sleeper. We had such a great time on Saturday, that we invited Shaun and Emma over to our house on Sunday for football.
The couple had lived in peace for over 50 years until couple months ago, Liu, now 72 year-old, returned from his daily farm work and collapsed. Xu sat and prayed with her husband as he passed away in her arms. So in love with Xu, was Liu, that no one was able to release the grip he had on his wife’s hand even after he had passed away.
My rewrite is simple. Just eliminate “at the time of the Adoption of this Constitution.” For enhanced eloquence, it might read as follows: “At the time of Adoption of this Constitution, we the undersigned decree that no person except a natural born citizen or a citizen of the United States, shall be eligible for the Office of the President.”
Sims 3
“I think we will get a really good vote,” Ms Dalton said.
Every single thing that is in your heart will fly to you. Like creation doesn’t even hesitate any longer… it just happens instantly.
Lawyers representing the 16, who include police officers, lawyers and traffic officers, told Sowetan yesterday that their clients were assaulted for no reason by the controversial unit.
All profits from the 50-50 Art Draw are shared equally between contributing artists and ARTSPACE. By supporting the 50-50 you not only support Peterborough’s only Artist Run Centre, but also individual local artists.
Trial and error. :)
The plan was a reaction to the funding cuts the California community college system had experienced. Like other California CCs, Santa Monica had already limited the supply of classes offered, even as the recession (and cuts to public 4-year schools) had increased demand. Something had to give.
I’m going to give you a quick and dirty trick that will at least give you a general idea of what the editor should offer. This isn’t gospel though. Don’t be quoting back to me 6 months from now saying, “you said if I followed the silly thingie formula, I should expect to get offered XYZ.”
Here are a couple of pages I made last night, my first time ever looking at and using the software...honest, see, I am not fibbing about how FABULOUS this software is...and it does so much more... you grow with the program and vice versa...How cool is that?!
Tim Holtz...Pattern & Stitches Texture Fades
“…There’s anarchism and then there’s anarchy…”
I'm not enjoying a very positive time at the moment. There are times when it is easy to get low and stay there. Recent/current health worries are making me feel unusually stressed, so my husband suggested a walk around the antiques emporiums in town this morning to cheer me up. I should have known THAT would be fatal! I was casting a jaundiced eye (after last weekend!) over various pieces of china and collectables, when I looked up and saw this beautiful watercolour. It reminded me both of my New Forest childhood and of course, the moors of Dartmoor. We asked the price, which wasn't at all expensive, and left the shop to walk back to the car. My OH knew I really wanted it, but I was of the philosphy that money wasn't exactly plentiful at the moment and if it was meant for me, when I DID have the money, it would still be there waiting. Anyway, the long and the short of it was that we turned round and we got a suitable amount off the asking price and it came home with us and is now hanging on the bedroom wall. Another week of beans on toast and vegetable curry then!
The perfect weather this Thanksgiving weekend led me out of doors to walk off some of the holiday meal. Rockefeller State Park Preserve is touted for its scenic walking trails and it did not disappoint on Saturday when I wandered through the wooded areas taking pictures and enjoying the warm fresh air.
Here's today's declutter page. I used my "Love, the Greatest of These" page kit.
The Ketamines - Skin Trade
Beans - 10 nos, sliced
So, I managed (with a lot of help from my wonderful family) to keep the Art Journaling weekend on course, it's just taken me a couple of weeks to get it on here.
She has my dream chairs! Which, by the way, she found on craigslist. I kind of hate her a little bit. I seriously carry this picture around in my purse just in case I stumble upon some chairs and need to compare.
Many of us working in older adult nutrition often work with clients who complain of poor appetite. This isn’t surprising since we now know that as we age our hormonal regulation of appetite is altered. Hormonal changes coupled with changes in the GI tract (early satiety, constipation and changes in smell and taste, etc.) can make feeding drive reduced.
I made some potato wedges using the air-fryer for our afternoon snack today. I never make potato wedges before, neither baked or fried. I thought it requires a very long cooking time. Now I know I was wrong. By using the air-fryer, this can be ready in just 15 minutes, with only a tablespoon of cooking oil. As you can see, the result is so satisfying. It's worth a try.
I detail the circumstances
I asked her if I could write a post about her being in the book, you know, brag on her a bit!
Then he recommended the surgery first thing this morning, Wednesday morning. We could chance it, let it fall off on its own and go on about our business, but he was concerned that if she had any lesions beneath the nail, they could eventually become infected and turn into something much worse than an ugly toenail. I just want to do what’s best for Anna, what will leave her the least psychologically scarred in life.
I spent a little time perusing their shops to come up with some great items for my list of needs. Let's shop together!!
Below is a picture of the original logo that I was working from and both myself and E-Beads would love to hear what you think of my version of their logo. Leave a comment on my blog, or email E-Beads via their website or become a 'fan' of their Facebook page and leave a comment there.
53They live, they speak, they breathe what love inspires,
We tie our shoes day after day, and we teach our kids to tie their shoes the way we tie them so that generation after generation grows up tying their shoes the way it has always been done. Just because it’s always been done that way by your family, however, doesn’t mean it’s the best or right way to do it.
Saturday, Oct 22 is Yang-Yin: A combo class I teach with Kristin about 2 times per year - once in the fall and once in the spring. We start out the class with an invigorating hour of Vinyasa (by Kristin) and follow up with a restorative hour of Yin (by me). Some yoga experience is helpful.
Then season well with Pepper, Salt, and Spice;
And then it’s mixing time: the long wooden spoon
Things you just don’t think about.
I have won 2 first prize ribbons, 1 second place and best of show in the last 7 years. But it seems that I have needed to keep getting the ribbons until I got the message. My husband pointed out the lesson to me late one night after winning this second blue ribbon.......
It was interesting to see that a lot of the things that people considered beautiful were full of colour.
Take a risk and put your hearts true desire into action. This is the perfect time to move forward and delegate responsibility to all those involved. Don’t do everything yourself. You don’t need to be alone. Let others do their part and ask others to help you along the way. Your household situations are improving and change is afoot, either through a move or healthy change that provides you with a safer, more balanced situation.
Okay so you’re not sixteen anymore and you realize that life is too short to waste valuable reading hours on rubbish. So the question is whether you should pick up this hefty ‘state of the nation’ type tome by Sebastian Faulks set in December, 2007 and providing a snapshot of London (and the world to an extent) in that time period.
1 tsp cinnamon
Basically, I’m writing this article on a whim to alert you to the fact that you should NOT listen to this album. DO. NOT. LISTEN. TO. IT. Under no circumstances should you purchase this record. If you do, bricks may be thrown through your kitchen windows bearing death threat notes from an anonymous source.
When American officers ordered the able-bodied to retreat, Father Kapaun, a 35-year-old captain, refused to leave the wounded. As the Chinese soldiers began lobbing grenades into the dugout, Kapaun negotiated a surrender.
Major John C. Marshall has been discharged. He and his wife are in a hotel in Los Angeles. In the lobby he overhears two cops at the desk asking for him. He goes back to the room and he and Suzanne get out of there. They go to see Henry Fleming, a PR man for the very wealthy Wilton Havers to find out what’s going on.
More water sports pictures today, but I’ve written enough about the denizens of the shoreline in recent days, so I’m taking a different tack (excuse the pun).
CTMH Beautiful Day stamp set
Ah, but for what? There’s an object lesson here for those of us who love to do these formal “classical” exercises, and that’s that it invites knowledgable audience members to play a fairly irrelevant game of gotcha. These compromises (and there are undoubtedly a lot more) are in the end superficial. Not only would you find just as many in any such period piece, but as all producers know, each one was more likely the result of an informed conversation and a choice rather than a mistake made out of ignorance.
P.S. For anybody looking to learn how to do bead embroidery, I learned from Sherry's book The Art of Bead Embroidery that she co-wrote with Heidi Kummli. That book was my bible and the coolest part is that it's almost like two books in one. Sherry and Heidi share each of their styles (which are very different) and learning both styles let me figure out "Dawn's way" a style unique to me. Sherry was my teacher even before she knew she was my teacher!
The girl gets up and begins to walk over, I could swear she looked at me.
5Therefore the wicked will not stand in the judgment, Nor sinners in the assembly of the righteous.
even reach any cleaning supplies?
Bop till you Drop
Another big difference is in the treadles. On Zoe, when you push down on a lever and don’t touch any of the others, they automatically snap up. For example, you push down any two levers, and you have two shafts up, and two shafts down.Push three levers, you have one up and three down. Not so with Talyn. Each treadle works independently, so when you are done with the shaft, you have to physically put that shaft back in place if you aren’t using it again. Otherwise, you pull down the treadles for the shafts you are working with, and the ones you previously used are still down, and will stay there until you move them. Having grown so used to Zoe, I can’t help but feel that’s odd.
It's big, it's bad, and it's most decidedly corporate. And although any card carrying beer geek has probably had every beer on its tap list of 40+ beers, you must grudgingly agree The Yardhouse at San Jose's Santana Row finally provides a place you can get an honest to goodness beer in San Jose's upscale Santa Row, where half the fun of going there is seeing people who are there to be seen. And sorry, but that stuffy bar that charges something like fifteen bucks for a glass of Chimay doesn't count as a place to go for a beer.
Lately I have been all but obsessed with bittering up classic cocktail recipes. Though this may just be a consequence of having recently acquired a bunch of amari and quinquinas, almost all of my cocktail experiments have included something bitter. Recently, the Palmetto Cocktail in general has garnered a lot of attention in this respect. Simply a rum Manhattan, its recipe is relatively easy to manipulate in a variety of directions. Besides, the intersection of rum and either an amaro or fortified wine almost always yields interesting, tasty results.
Since I've been back from that my internet hasn't been working and I've been preoccupied with assignments.
In the 1970's the building was converted into a cold storage facility for a company called Saninsena. It then briefly became the offices of an advertising company in the 1980's. And in 2000 it was converted into a nightclub called Sea and now it is still a nightclub known as Riverside.
The English Beat ESB
So early on Monday morning, we hied ourselves to downtown Oakland (always charming) and located the Country Recorder's office. It was surprisingly easy to find, and surprisingly easy to find street parking (albeit metered parking).
Is it because in a lot of ad agencies, radio is seen as a way of letting juniors cut their teeth, before getting stuck into TV? In one big agency I worked for, there was definitely an unwritten hierarchy of media that you got to scale as you proved yourself - and I can tell you radio was not at the higher end.
Allison Sekemoto survives in the Fringe, the outermost circle of a vampire city. By day, she and her crew scavenge for food. By night, any one of them could be eaten. Some days, all that drives Allie is her hatred of them. The vampires who keep humans as blood cattle. Until the night Allie herself is attacked—and given the ultimate choice. Die or become one of the monsters. Faced with her own mortality, Allie becomes what she despises most. To survive, she must learn the rules of being immortal, including the most important: go long enough without human blood, and you will go mad. Then Allie is forced to flee into the unknown, outside her city walls. There she joins a ragged band of humans who are seeking a legend—a possible cure to the disease that killed off most of humankind and created the rabids, the mindless creatures who threaten humans and vampires alike. But it isn’t easy to pass for human. Especially not around Zeke, who might see past the monster inside her. And Allie soon must decide what—and who—is worth dying for.
General Contractors are also using milestone photos to reduce risk. MultiVista, a national firm, captures visual as-builts indexed according to your architectural drawings. Using photos and videos of your project progress, documentation includes that of subcontractors, before work is hidden behind walls, buried in concrete or above ceiling tiles. All photos are date, time and position stamped making them a deliverable to the project owner. In cases of component failures the interior progression photos can limit your rework scope.
In writing news it has been a good week though!
Now, if you ask me to bet on the likelihood that New York will successfully adapt to the advent of digital and the emergence of Amazon as a publisher, I would have to regretfully decline to bet very much. As I noted in my previous post, companies coddled by a lack of competition get flabby, and New York, which hasn't faced real competition in living memory, is now squaring off against a formidable competitor indeed. I don't think it's likely legacy publishers will be able to adapt and survive. And though I hope I'm wrong about that, my hope doesn't lead me to want to protect New York from competition, either.
The truth is that we do love each other- the truth is that I often wonder if we can go on living like roommates.
"No matter what life - or Satan himself - hands us, the favor God has on His children causes that "lot" to tumble out on the table in such a way that, instead of destruction, the child will discover that her portion turned into destiny one trusting step at a time." Beth Moore, pg. 208
Tools: Spellbinders Nestibilities Large Circles and Large Scalloped Circles with Sizzix Big Shot, Paper Trimmer.
or the way Mrs Whats-a-me-call-it
7. High Speed Posters – music by David Matthews
The third game sucked. Since these were still placement matches, we were against some platinum players, and I definitely showed my complacency. I’d also like to add in that as much as I know they are legitimate tactics, I hate cheese. Our opponents were both Protoss, and we got cannon rushed. Learned from that match that I need to pay attention to the smallest thing, and not let anything get by me without checking it out.
Annie Lockhart shares some great tips for attaching objects in your mixed-media pieces with wire in this PDF tutorial.
I cut the fabric with pinking shears, (so it doesn't fray,) then I folded it in half and then pressed the crease.
Just a glance at the back of General Geldenhuys’ previous book shows the names of all the SADF soldiers who died in that war. Take note of all the black surnames in there.
The latest rise of Islam came quickly, coinciding with the fall of the last great threat to the west, the cold war, a coincidence among many which we ignore at our peril.
But, enough about me! What’s new with you?
Scots comedian Stu Who commented that he had had the “pleasure …of meeting, and socialising, with an astonishingly wide range of musicians, actors, comedians, writers, and celebrities with no discernible talent other than being ‘well-known’.”
You gave everything for someone?
Hate when that happens.
Let me lay this out in such straightforward terms that it can't be ignored.
Kacker (cracker)
Because in your body you carry the mini Cosmos and, when your body matter changes back into pure MATTER, that which was in the beginning, it has the capacity to bring in powerful changes in the universes and the whole cosmos. The pure MATTER has the capacity to dissolve the old mechanism of nature (The old Law of the Whole and create the New there and then.).
when i'm out walkin', i strut my stuff
“Not so little that together they could have taken on a couple of teens just a few years older. They all ran. What did you do Marley?”
1/4 c quick- cooking tapioca
12) Paying conservative "journalists" to shill for No Child Left Behind
~my lil' boy turned 1 this year
Overheard Tracy on the 8th of October talking to people passing by. She was so Happy. So Proud of her "Sucks BALLS" sign. She marveled at how her sign seemed to be the "Most Popular."
You see, I lived out in the antactic rainforest. I was born there in fact.
As for Whitman’s “inseparable cities”, if we really cared, we would treat the destruction of Detroit by greed and corruption (look at the photos on that site) as we attempted to treat the destruction of New Orleans by Hurricane Katrina. Detroit did not, does not, deserve the terrible pestilence of greed visited upon it any more than New Orleans "deserved" the wrath of Katrina. The latter is different only in that it was an unavoidable act of nature(unless you stop to ask why New Orleans continues to exist where it does).
So, who has earned the right to hear my story?﻿ Anybody who is wanting to understand the struggles that effect breastfeeding moms. Those who want to push for better breastfeeding education. Those who want to look at the big picture of how small things can harm many breastfeeding relationships. Those who need support as they struggle with their own breastfeeding relationship. Those are the people who have earned the right to hear my story.
Another man in a large truck blared country music as he raced across my peak.
12. (announcer)
Update - I've received an email from TfL's press office who wanted to clarify the following:
Ocean Bowl, Pendennis Rise, Falmouth TR11 4LT
I can’t bear to tell all the details of these stories here. It’s too raw, too hard to handle. But they are present and a foggy sadness has set in.
Vancouver, British Columbia,Canada
Quick one today as I'm off to GBBF trade session in a minute. Back to Russian River and Pliny The Elder's nephew, Pliny The Younger!
Bahía Solano is reached from Bogotá, on flights runned by Satena and ADA airlines for around AUD 300.
5. Ask business people to rent a booth (i.e. people who sell candles, make-up, household products, etc.) – booth rental is NOT for individual people to sell ‘rummage sale’ type goods.
ブッダ：３割のアメリカ人は字がやっと読めるか全く読めないかみたいだよ。
So there you have it folks, you have two fabulous to choose from this week and I can’t wait to see just what you create for us.
The dining room was adorned with a few flourishes.
Have a friend who's lost a pet recently? You can have their pet memorialized by planting a tree in their honor. The Arbor Day Foundation will plant the tree and send your friend a certificate that let's them know about your RAK.
It’s rather amusing really, because I seem to be getting more views in Australia than I am in my own country. Which could mean one of two things, either I’m writing about the wrong things and so UK readers are rejecting me, or, I’m saying the right things, it’s just that people in Australia have more time on their hands.. Though not enough time to comment and/or subscribe/follow me on twitter, interesting. Maybe I should emigrate to Australia, I might be liked more there, plus, it’s WARM…
After the customary greetings and jokes, he asked. “Hey. Are we doing dinner or something tomorrow night? Is that what we planned? I didn’t write anything down, but I know we talked about doing something…I just can’t remember.”
Thank you for reading. Have a wonderful day!
But this is not about a movie and I only make reference to the Anna and the King because the restaurant I just ate at has the Victorian-style chairs which were used on the movie set of Anna & The King. In fact I may have sat in the same chair that Jody and Mr. Fat sat in.
Yes, they have.
Again, like le Fumoir, this is a bar that is equipped to make what you want and can put out a good cocktail. But, again, this one didn’t impress me from a cocktail perspective as much as the Experimental (where you get the impression that the person behind the bar is not just willing, but interested in discussing the cocktail and its creation and the various ingredients to give you exactly what you want)
One thing about Cari, she was no quitter.
“I’m coming, love.”
7 National Affront 7:04
Once the sun goes down, the evening entertainment begins. The performers tell the story of the history the Polynesian migration, the Hula, and the modern hula. Their web site reads:
I mean binding done, label on, ready for the hand off.
My mom is pretty sure that if he is thanking Alice for changing his diaper then he is ready to not have a diaper. I'm sure he is too... but I'm not. That is a lot of work making sure a little person gets to the potty all the time. I need to make the time and just dive in but I've been hesitating. His teacher is pushing it as well for a self care goal at his upcoming IEP meeting. All things point in this direction except me wanting to deal with dirty pants and being forced to take him to the potty every time he decides it would be fun to tell me that he has to go and who really is silly enough to doubt a potty training toddler's need to make it to the potty fast. More to come on this topic I'm sure.
I love anything that has that poinsettia flower on it!
Dear fabulous readers,
I don't know how she went from no discernable brain activity last Friday to shaking her head up and down and side to side in response to yes/no questions.
The Nisei students — children of Japanese immigrants — were swept up with their families in 1942 and forcibly relocated to internment camps, halting their college education. In recent years, universities across the West Coast have handed out honorary degrees to help repair the wounds.
and god knows the heart did sink
But about a quarter of the building remains under contract to the SEC. Tim Jaroch, managing general partner of David Nassif Associates, which owns the building, said the lease required the agency to begin paying $1.3 million monthly on Nov. 1 of 2011, meaning it will owe $7.75 million by April 30 and $18 million by Dec. 31.
Then he stumbled a little and looked horrified.
USA Today, in an article out last month, reports that teens (or is it parents) are now spending between $1000 and $2000 on going to the prom. Am I alone in thinking this is insane? OK, so I’m someone who has never had a professional manicure or pedicure, has never set foot in a spa, and got my wedding dress off the clearance rack. I am probably more shocked by prom-gone-wild than the average parent. But I wonder, are these expectations reasonable in this economic environment? And are we setting up our teens to expect all the luxuries they want throughout life without consideration for the costs? Worse, if a young man (or young woman I suppose) is spending so much for one night, is he going to expect to “cash in” with a romp at the hotel? Just today I heard the story of a woman who recounted the first time she had sex. Junior Prom. It was the price she had to pay to get her older boyfriend, who didn’t want to hang out with high schoolers, to go. She called it “prostituting” herself, but used rougher words So sad.
same, but some of the stuff he were coming off with on that dander home were suspect, suspect at the very least: the most mendacious load of baloney involving the Filipinos (or Filli's, as he calls em) getting loaded on methamphetamine and being able to communicate telepathically...and their kids, he said, this is how they communicate generally anyway.
But as long as a tiny seed of self-consciousness
12. profanity prayers- beck
In the meantime I have had another birthday. Another one where we were unable to go out and celebrate with a meal. Another promise....
The blades of the UH-60 Blackhawk slashed at the air as they flattened the grasses of the meadow in which General Wei and his troops were camped. The helicopter had been “re-assigned” from a U.S. military unit to the Chinese PLAAF troops under General Watanabe’s command. Still relatively new to the bird, the Chinese pilot was getting used to the controls. He set the Blackhawk down hard jarring the troops inside.
Faith, Through the Shrouded Day
refusal to legitimize outside power and governance (even if only in theory), its indeterminate duration, its state of permanent crisis (read: the risk of eviction) can create a situation where tribal life-ways can be discovered and explored. Occupy starts a process that can turn a well functioning, socially cohesive camp into a self defined tribe (as much Hell Angel as Yanomami) that may
"My colleague and I were discussing, at length, the art of tattooing (it was, after all, Friday afternoon!).
Amy quickly realizes that her awakening was no mere computer malfunction. Someone-one of the few thousand inhabitants of the spaceship-tried to kill her. And if Amy doesn't do something soon, her parents will be next.
And some pictures of the celebrations in the USA. Let's all remember now how the Arab world celebrated after 9/11....an eye for an eye is my motto in life. U.S. officials have reportedly told broadcaster CNN that bin Laden's body has already been buried at sea in order to prevent the grave from becoming a shrine for extremists - a brilliant move by the USA.
Maybe it’s a little bold to invoke this quote after only a six-month experience, but this trip was the first time I jumped out there and went for it in a meaningful way. This I believe is going to be how I remember my time in New Zealand. It was a time in my life that I tried to life purely without regret, and the liberating environment of NZ made it possible.
482110 Rail transportation
Since we were celebrating our 4th anniversary late, they made us this special plate for the occasion.
Big Business is about the small picture.
At the same time, he was writing a longer-than 15,000 page single-spaced novel. He spent a lot of his time creating, without anyone else ever seeing the results.
Pondering these questions has forced me to learn about new options. Happily I discovered that EBay has a program that allows you to donate a portion or all of your sales to your favorite charity. They actually credit you back for a portion of your shipping and sales fees in proportion to your donation. Give 10 percent and get 10% rebate in fees. Give 100% and get 100% rebate in fees! Pretty cool!
We're house hunting.
Now you need to feed the multicore wire through the neck and down to the base of the lamp. You can pull it through the hole near the base, and then will need to drill a hole in the base to feed it through to the electronics as such:
My throne is in the heaven's azure deep;
The fall hawkwatching season is already gathering speed, picking up more sites, more raptors and more species along the way. Since last week, another four sites have started reporting data, and the first Red-shouldered Hawks, Mississippi and Swallow-tailed Kites, Merlin and Peregrine Falcons were tallied, along with both vultures.
14. Doo Doo Doo Doo Doo (Heartbreaker)
I cannot possibly wait; in fact if you go to Townhall.com and read what other best-selling authors are espousing about Pavlich’s new book, it definitely gets a “MUST READ” before Novemeber distinction. Thank you.
On the level of nations or that of populations, in other words, it’s neither possible nor useful to divide the structure of empire into the simplistic categories of oppressor and oppressed, ruler and ruled. Many nations in any imperial system fall between the summit and the base of the pyramid, and are permitted to pump wealth out of nations lower down on the condition that they forward a certain fraction of the take further up. The vast majority of people in the imperial nation and its allies, and a certain fraction of those even in the most heavily exploited subject nations, receive at least a modest share of wealth and privilege in exchange for their cooperation in maintaining the imperial system, compete constantly for a bigger share, and generally limit their criticisms of the imperial system to those aspects of it that profit somebody else. That’s why empires have proven to be so enduring a human social form; the basic toolkit of empire includes an ample assortment of ways to buy the loyalty, or at least the passive acquiescence, of all those potential power centers that might otherwise try to destabilize the imperial system and bring the empire crashing down.
No. Living our Rituals is not always easy, and no, it is not always simple. But, YES it can be done. It can be done today, and tomorrow, it can be done at chapter meetings and philanthropy events, it can be done in our classes and yes, we can even live our Ritual when we're out at a bar or surrounded by friends.
Pencil (with eraser, only if you REAAALLLY want to erase something)
I almost finished with the second bobbin of the oatmeal colored BFL/silk. This is an Ashford blend and I noticed just like the merino/angora/silk blend it has globs of short bits of silk. I have to stop and thin it out a bit as I go along or makes a good sized slub in my single. Another reason to have a drum carder so I can make perfectly blended batts.
Here's my disclaimer on the following video: *It's British humor.
Fixed down with about 250 clout-head galvanised nails.
I have several friends walking rough roads right now.
To read ‘Meeting Lydia‘ is to sit in a comfy front room with the author, and listen while she tells you the story. Linda MacDonald is a raconteur, an ‘under-the-banyan-tree’, book-at-bedtime story teller, who conjures up complex images through a stream-of-consciousness narrative. Some might say there is more telling than showing, but they would be mistaken in judging this to be a fault. The telling is not exposition, not info-dumping, not tedious scene-setting. The telling is Bridget Jones; it is the internal curiosities, private debates, and mental machinations of the main character, Marianne, as she negotiates a mid-life crisis, the menopause, and a re-emergence of past horrors. If you are intrigued by relationships, by the seismic shifts brought on by the passage of time, or by the impact of early experience on the adult psyche, you will find more than enough here to meet your requirements. And while fiction it may be, the fact is grounded and you can trust the psychology, the insights, and the research. Linda knows her stuff, and it shows.
If they did nothing now…
I'm trying, desperately, to entice Ellen Degeneres to give a pint to the cause on her show - wouldn't THAT be fabulous? Or maybe SHE would let a winner come visit HER in California? I've been emailing and tweeting her trying to get her to notice my blood drive efforts, but I know she gets thousands of requests every day, but just as she wanted to be on the cover of Oprah magazine, she didn't quit, so I'm not going to quit bugging her on my quest to get her to at least give me a pint of blood. In fact, wouldn't she look GREAT donating a pint of blood?
What would it look like if we threw a healing party? Everyone in our community could come with their individual gifts and strengths, and we could celebrate being the body of Christ together. Then, before we leave the “party,” we could pray together for our community to be healed and become whole. Is there any better party favor than healthy community?
Matthew is just over 3 months now and time is flying - I hate it. I truly do. I can tell already that he's going to be a handful .. the second he can scoot around the floor he's going to do it. The second he figures out how to talk, he's never going to stop.
Anybody got any thoughts on this? Lemme know.
Make run the blood
My weekend was filled with def too many calories and bad food choices, AGAIN. But it wasn't as horrible as it could of been, and I still practiced SOME self control.
The key problem is the early years of development when in financing terms investment on sewers roads etc. are heavy and returns from rents are lowest. One potential mechanism would be for infrastructure providers to use their balance sheets, to fund the infrastructure themselves in return for a long term rent on that infrastructure. So for example you could set up a company to build the roads, which would obtain equity funding, and then it would receive rents over say twenty years which would be added to ground rents. This could be very attractive to the likes of pension funds looking for long term low risk returns. To ensure infrastructure work is coordinated and project planned together any development corporation might set up an ‘infraco’ similar to that used for the Olympics. This could be done in partnership with one of England’s world leading engineering companies sharing the same offices as the development cooperation. Being able to access specialist skills and integrate them is critical and these companies are doing this every day on projects around the world. It makes more sense to bring on board a partner rather than trying to set up these skills from scratch, so a long term framework agreement would make sense with the development corporation directly appointing a chief engineer to oversee the contract and sign off all work.
I'm home. I had a full day at workI've unpacked. And I'm getting ready for bed.
This beer made me break the rules.
And I drink the stuff. Several cups a day.
Beyond its immediate appeal as a cute, rustic, cabin-like getaway, Walking Studio may well read as a significant material marker of the way Borsato’s many ephemeral works—from 2001’s Touching 1000 People to 2011’s revolving Walking Studio residencies at Don Blanche—have gelled into a very concrete art career.
I don’t really have anything else to say about Firestarter. Oh, except that Martin Sheen was in it. That makes two Stephen King movies in a row to feature Martin Sheen. I find that neat, especially since the movies came out in consecutive years (1983 for The Dead Zone and 1984 for Firestarter). But that’s really it. The movie was alright. But it’s not anything I would probably ever watch again.
For a debut writer, Mangesh has used crisp, clean and very free flowing language that is not only easy but also grammatically fine. (Such relief there.)
Eventually frustrations will surface over common areas not looking as pristine as they once did or the increase in association dues to cover expenses. Who is to blame? The Developer is no longer at fault, so one cannot target him. This only leaves one governing body to hold responsible – the Board of Directors, a volunteer group of individuals who are neighbors. THEY are the bad guy and must be stopped!
All right. “The Earth King” is a great episode, and if you’ve read my previous reviews, you’ll probably have a good idea as to why. This episode does almost everything right, and is never offensive nor boring. And it flies by pretty fast. Maybe too fast. The episode shows the kids, having finally reunited with Appa, flying straight to the Earth King’s palace in order to finally give him that information from “The Library” on how they can end the war with the Fire Nation. Of course, they have to convince him that Long Feng, his adviser, is the leader of the conspiracy to cover up the war, and that won’t be too easy.
/opt/VRTSddlpr/config
EDITED 1/10/12 TO ADD: D Publishing has overhauled and re-posted its publishing agreement. Changes include making the grant of subsidiary rights non-exclusive, and making the contract term 10 years (still much too long--plus, the contract renews automatically unless the author remembers to cancel). Most of the terms I've objected to--including the exclusive grant of primary publishing rights and the confusing royalty structure--remain.
There are more guards coming down the corridor. When they round the corner they see Jonah crouching in the darkness and open fire, however they have been fooled into shooting their fallen comrade (upon whose head Jonah placed his Confederate hat.)
1/17—Apparatus Theory; Screening: The Purple Rose of Cairo (1985); Reading: Baudry, “Ideological Effects of the Basic Cinematographic Apparatus” (CV 34-43)
Use a bowl scraper or wooden spoon to incorporate the dough into the center until it forms a unified mass. Gentle now... we don't want to over work the dough. On a lightly floured surface, form the dough into a rectangle loaf.
100 blanched hazelnuts, roughly chopped
Finally, a swatch of a four-ply Shetland yarn from sheep grazing on a local nature reserve. someone at the Guild processes the fleece and sends it off to be spun in Devon. The result is a lovely cosy sample - lofty is the term, I believe. I am contemplating a jumper for my husband's birthday in August and this looks just the ticket.
And I realize that in all of my hurt- I’ve been most guilty of hurting him.
All politics aside, it is an amazing and extremely special thing to have this Jewish state among the nations. A people millennia old; conquered, despised, dispersed, killed, robbed, tortured, almost whipped out by genocide. And yet here we are, a nation smaller in land mass than the US state of New Jersey. A place for a people the world has time and again turned their backs on, a home to reestablish roots in.
Christy Dorrity loves to read about cooking and cook about reading. She was taught early to have a discriminating taste for both books and food. Christy grew up on a trout ranch in Star Valley, Wyoming. She taught elementary school and lives in the mountains with her husband Devon and their five young children. When Christy’s not reading or writing, she’s probably trying out a new recipe in the kitchen.
Celebrate with a Flourish-all cuts
Well, this matchup has already been decided. The main concern for the Bulls during the post-season was going to be keeping their star player healthy in an effort to maintain their title hopes. Unfortunately for Chicago fans those hopes were all but dashed last night when Rose tore his ACL while driving into the lane. In spite of their recent success without Rose it is highly unlikely that the Bulls will make it far in the absence of their best player.
I just found this little snipet of an interview from a couple of years ago... enjoy!
In an unusual and worrying development there was one suicide attack reported over the week – not in the more hostile central provinces, but on the edge of Arbil city in Iraqi Kurdistan. Fortunately the professional Kurdish security forces were able to kill the bomber before he detonated his vehicle laden with explosives but the incident highlights the fact that even normally secure KRG territory is not entirely immune from terrorism.
The taxi driver just slammed on the brakes and shouted at her to "Get out of my fucking taxi you stupid bitch, if you're so thick you can't even put on a seat belt then I wont let you ride in my taxi"
It’s silly. And shameful: It shows a dramatically self-centred aspect to my personality.
The next three years (1837-1840) must have been the best Jacob had ever experienced with any of the Virginia Wheelers. The three cousins – Naomi, Rachel and Leah – finally began to view Thunder Heart Woman as a member of the family and cherished her and Jacob’s three children (Abraham had been born in Wheelerton in 1836 and Jacob Jr. was born in Missouri sometime in late 1840). Jacob’s close relationship with Jethro seemed like a far cry from the conflicts with Nathan that marred his trip to the west back in the 1820s. One would begin to think that Jacob no longer suffered from any insecurity by this point. And yet . . . they only remained buried inside him, waiting for the right moment to manifest.
I hate that that doctor’s words hid out in my psyche and sucker punched me. He’s like a white-coat-wearing Jack in the Box with a doomsday attitude. And as mad as I am about what he said that I cannot forget, I’m even more angry on behalf of all those other folks he may have convinced. I worry about the patients who believed that doctor and others like him who make unfounded prognoses.
How you read a book is certainly important and plays a major role in what you get out of it. Many people do not know how to read the Bible. Furthermore, many people do not approach the Bible without a certain set of presuppositions. Peterson is not exempt. He tells the story in the book about what led him to paraphrase the Bible and how it came about that he wrote “The Message” (A complete paraphrase of the whole Bible in common, everyday language). The problem is that Peterson would consider his paraphrase a translation, but if it is a translation, we obviously have two different opinions on accuracy.
Freida Pinto looks out of place as Phaedra. In a film (loosly) based on Greek mythology, you would expect the oracle to have some resemblance to an original Greek Goddess. Also, Frieda’s accent and mannerisms do her character no good. Henry Cavill is beefy and strong but has poor dialogue delivery skills. The others are just about average. But it’s hard to display your acting skills when you’re only role is to fight and die.
-Please remember to use common spaces with consideration for your peers!
“This morning alone the API reading was somewhere between 90 to 100, which can’t be healthy at all, I must say,” he said, covering his nose in disgust while pointing to the smog engulfing the city centre. “That was why the auuthorities had been against the BERSIH movement all these while, we knew their efforts would not make any difference to the air quality. It’s pointless, only causes inconvenience to the already suffocating KL people and at the end of the day, is an exercise in futility. We want them to go do something more productive and healthy, like enjoying the weekend with their families.
11/30/2007 31.19
Here we are at the end of the semester. Frankly speaking, these four months passed faster than I had thought (but what did I expect? – it’s always like that). This means that it’s time to sum up what we’ve learned during our Multimedia Journalism Class. First of all, four months ago I couldn’t even imagine being able to create a blog, shoot videos, and connect to almost all the possible types of social media. This course gave me a real idea of what journalism in today’s world is like.
Enjoy the looks that I pinned on Pinterest. This site is making me be more creative and it gives me idea of the types of styles that I want to add to Trunk’d Clothing. Inspiration is everywhere if we just open our eyes and look.
I know this post offers no soft answers. In my case, English is not my first language; each time I type I am self-conscious about my writing and fear that what I am writing is not proper English. The reason English is not my first language is political in origin. My father emigrated to this country unwillingly. The choice to return was denied him. During my first few years of childhood, as my father has told me, I was completely bilingual in Spanish and English. I then lost the language through divorce; even then, though, I was exposed to two other languages through my maternal grandparents. My grandfather spoke German; my grandmother, Polish. As a child, I had always thought that when I heard my grandmother and her sister speaking Polish that they were saying “sssh” whenever I was nearby. The “s” sounds in Polish (the sibilant sounds) stand out prominently, especially to the non-native speaker. With my paternal grandparents I heard Spanish because they never fully assimilated with English. My paternal grandmother refused to learn English because she never accepted the United States as her home. My maternal grandmother, at the end of her life, had reverted to speaking only German and Polish: none of her children ever understood what she was saying because none had ever learned either of the two.
You’ll then need to start by preparing your chicken. If you didn’t buy cutlets, you’ll need to slice your chicken breasts into thin, long strips. To make things easier for yourself, when shopping look for pre-cut, thin sliced chicken cutlets. You can also buy your meat from the grocery butcher counter and ask them to slice it into cutlets for you… this is a great route too because you can ask them to cut each piece as close to 3oz. as possible.
Being the helpful person I am, I find it necessary to make the lives of those I come in contact with more enjoyable and actually worth living. Today, I am proposing a new time phenomenon, a world wide time shift based on need, rather than location or time of year.
Today we attended church in a familiar spot, a place we tend to gravitate back to now and again. The simple structure sits in a green field outside of City Solei. Patrick and I have been there enough times that our introductions are now, “glad to see you again” and the faces in the congregation greet us with smiles of recognition instead of curious stares. Thanks to a largely sleepless night with Mr. Teething, I snagged a seat in the back with the other mothers-with-small-children anticipating a restlessly tired boy. In all honesty, its my favorite seat in the house, and in that church especially, I feel welcome. From such a vantage point, I watched mothers nursing quiet their infants, little sisters holding the hand of their even littler brothers, kids wiggling and dancing to the music, balloons and silk flowers hanging from the beams of the ceiling above, hands clapping in song or waving in prayer, and from the front of the church our new friends taking it all in. On one particular lively hymn, when the entire congregation seemed caught up in the energy of the music and Solomon was clapping in my arms to the beat of the drum, I grinned in complete and simple happiness.
8. Proof of ownership of property 18
Indeed, in his memoir, My American Journey, Powell justifies many of the worst tactics, such as burning down Vietnamese villages and shooting unarmed peasants from helicopters, acts that objectively would constitute war crimes.
Who does Miss Weber blame her abortion on? The pro-life movement.
I'm eating like a caveman.
I hate that Titanic is so popular because it is bad. I don’t think Titanic is bad because it is popular. So I dunno… Maybe it is exactly what it looks like.
On to the giveaway and Virtual 5K. My giveaway is going to be coming as soon as I get the items in the mail and I am very excited to do this one. I have never used this product and I can not wait to see if I like it or not! I will give you a hint.....
Tori Amos Cornflake girl US
I've been thinking about what love means to me a lot since Mattie asked me to write a post for her. It's a big question, and there are so many facets to love that a single post just cannot do it justice. The other lovely ladies who joined Mattie is this quest have already done a great job of touching on so many different aspects of Love. I've really enjoyed reading their posts the last few weeks, and if you haven't had a chance you can click the link and read the past posts as well.
Man Host is singing. The audience likes Man Host. He has a double barbed wire tattoo on his arm, thus he is obviously badass.
Of course, they–like I–gave you a hold on them. Which is why this is the last letter from me you’ll ever receive. No more monthly correspondence. No little notes with checks attached. No fevered checking on my status to make sure you’re still “cool” with me. And I’m blocking your personal ads–those pre-approved offers you keep sending me. I am not interested.
First up….its a long awaited, much sought after treat. Ladies and gents….may I present….the man grunt.
So even though we did not cook with veggies from our own garden today (well we actually own part of Jacobs Cove as a CSA member) we did do a completely fresh meal. By the way our garden is way healthy and we are looking forward to some great stuff from it!
(because it’s where I came in – although I could happily choose any of the solo concerts, From Vienna, Bregenz, Lauzanne, Tokyo, London, Paris, La Scale, Rio, and on and on) and the beautiful pared down
And which is the vessel and which is not?
If you would like to purchase the metal locker bin, just send me a note at theclassicbride@gmail.com with your zip code and I will get you a shipping quote. All final payments are accepted via PayPal.
Wouldn’t that be like stacking a tower of paint containers, all the while hoping it doesn’t fall? More importantly, if we take the approach of a two year old, and simply believe that we can do what we set our minds out to do, we can stack our tower as high as the sky, that we can create the career that we want?
…Invariably the first action in a divorce is to separate the children from one parent, usually the father. Even if he is innocent of any legal wrongdoing and does not agree to the divorce, the state seizes his children with no burden of proof to justify why. The burden of proof–and financial burden–falls on him to demonstrate why they should be returned.
I think, in many ways, baseball arguments come down to context. I hear all the time about how baseball fans are "stat people" and "anti-stat people," but I don't think that dividing line exists. I've never met a big baseball fan who didn't care about baseball stats. Ever. I'm not even sure how you can BE a big baseball fan without caring about stats. If someone asked, "How many hits did Pedroia have today?" what baseball fan would answer, "Oh, I don't know, I didn't count those?"
Level 16: MP Cost: 40, Duration: 480 seconds, All Stats: +8%.
The two movies, The Descendants and We Bought a Zoo, feature male actors I admire, George Clooney and Matt Damon, plus a talented cast of supporting actors. Each tells the story of how a man and his two children cope with the death of his wife/their mother, and each had equally compelling settings of the beauty of Kauai and a zoo full of animals. They were very different stories in other respects, but they both should have been winners. What went wrong?
If there are still good books, they are largely irrelevant to a form and business that is largely about the creation of the artifact—identifier, symbol, leave-behind, brand enhancer...
But the more important revelation is that— The America Idol Presidential Candidate Google Contest has finally come into its rightful place in American elections. Yes America– YOU will pick out the winner with YOUR votes! And WE will know just how to make who WE want to win, say just the right thing to get it!
Considering only the patents themselves, the proportions of initial ownership by large and small entities are almost equal in the most- and once-litigated data sets: 53.5% of most-litigated patents and 47.8% of once-litigated patents were issued to large entities. The picture is quite different, however, when one looks at the proportion of actual assertions in litigation, where large entities account for a surprisingly small percentage of the most-¬litigated patents. Because small entities are disproportionately represented in the actual litigation of most-¬litigated patents . . . patents that were initially issued to large entities represent only 22.4% of the assertions in the most-¬litigated group, compared to 47.8% of the once-¬litigated group.
Batistuta or better known as Bati­gol among his fans is Argentina’s leading goal scorer with 56 goals in 78 international matches and played in three World Cup Finals. He also won the Scudetto with AS Roma in 2000 and played for Qatar club Al-Arabi before retiring in 2005.
In sum: The rain and the cold are spoiling the end of the summer
This is gripping stuff which is very relevant in today’s society. Lewis is excellent as the troubled war veteran and Danes is even better as the maverick analyst who has her own secrets.
Max Scherzer 2010 Topps Tribute auto jersey: Here we have what might have been the first card Greg offered me when he first brought up trading, and I never lost interest in acquiring it. This is definitely one of those times where Topps got it right (stop laughing, it does happen) and I really like the total package here. As you can see, this one's #d 07/75, and that combined with a very legible "Max" in the signature make this card a win, plus my second Scherzer autograph.
Sharing the LOVE
Tips for San Diego residents on how to choose the right carpet cleaning service…
What do you think of this, it is made using one of Emma's cake decorating moulds, I used an off white fimo and then used Tim Holtz distressing inks to colour the embossed part and the edges. I love it, I will definitely be making more of these.....she has lots of moulds and now I know how to use them and what they look like.... WOW!!!!
The fact is that this sort of behaviour is inevitable. We have a system and a culture here based on endless growth, on the continually maximisation of profits. The goal of all these CEO types is to achieve these ends. The downsizing and mechanisation of their work forces at the expense of jobs will be as much as modern technology allows, as much as is seen viable by the board and investors. It’s the nature of the (relatively) free market economy, it’s the nature of the beast. A ravenous, fickle, bloated beast left unshackled and untamed for far too long. The answer should be simple. Rise up, cut the food supply and fetch the collar.
Brent teaches writing on the faculty at Vermont College in the MFA program in Writing for Children and Young Adults. He lives in Seattle with Michael Jensen, his partner since 1992.
Stay tuned..
What are you working on now? Do you find yourself stitching other people's designs less often and spending more time doing your own thing?
For participants from: YOUTH IN ACTION PROGRAMME COUNTRIES, NEIGHBOURING PARTNER COUNTRIES, OTHERS
I've been falling in love since I was born.
This has been heart-rending, but when God says, “Move!” you move. This is the church my Lord led me to soon after I became His. Don and I met and were married there. There, our daughter was dedicated at three weeks old, was baby Jesus for the Christmas pageant at seven weeks old, and has been instructed by loving and godly teachers from age two.
One hang up I have had since Ivey's birth is this .... no matter how I try to know Ivey or understand what it is to be her, really be her, I can not. My heart wants to know what it is to live in Ivey's world. But her world is so much more than I can fully grasp. In efforts to try, besides daily tasks, I took a course on deafblindness last year, endured several simulations being deafblind, wrote papers depicting my experiences, still, I am not deafblind. I have conceptual information. I do not have motor issues or mental implications. I walk. I speak. I am not my daughter. She is not me. She can not experience my world any more than I can truly experience her world. A simple fact that I can never change.
oh friends, his love never fails, never gives up, and never runs out on you. He is the great repairer of broken things. broken lives. And not only that, he Restores. So I may have only touched the sadness that I will experience here on this earth. But I am not destroyed. And there will surely be more things as long as i'm living in this earth that is not how it was supposed to be. And will not be, until Jesus comes again. But friends, God's repairing and restoring in my life.... He continually keeps me whole. Gives me Joy. This is what life is about. If we run to anything else in this life of game changers, we will be eaten alive and spit out. There wont be enough "self help" books out there to restore you.
1. Define the objective of the project
This was my first card of this type, and it was really easy to make! My hubby liked it and wanted one for his mom too. If you've never made this style Splitcoaststampers has a tutorial and video, but I followed this one from Your Next Stamp. I loved it because the poster gave measurements RIGHT on the pics!! When trying something like this, I NEED that, lol...As you'll see from these two links, this card style can be adapted to any theme! Well, I have to get myself together, find an envelope for this card, and be out the door in a bit! But like always, thanks for coming by to see me! Take care, and come by again real soon!
Anyone who sees gnarly dudes with swords and assumes the entertainment in question is for mindless adolescent boys isn’t paying attention. Entertainment that women like is not all “Sex and the City” and whatever maudlin domestic tragedy Lifetime is running at any given moment. Our personal worlds go beyond relationships, fashion and home. Our entertainment should, too. In this case? It most certainly does.
Next, the Vanzandt family:
GRAMS Diner will forever be one of my go-to places for great comfort food. You can view their full menu here.
I don't know where our lunch rates among the great culinary adventures we've had in Paris. That is to say, I didn't go into rapture with each bite, but it was certainly a meal I'll never forget. Between the watercress soup, the poulet de Bresse, the citrus tart, the wine pairings, the exceptional views of Paris (in the sunshine no less), and my most favorite person in the world for company, I was pretty much in heaven.
James paused when a familiar figure stepped out the front door. Ordinarily folks came and went through the kitchen entry, but something about Abby Lambright’s expression announced she was on no ordinary mission. And she was headed straight for him.
mayonnaise
Or, handed out money at red-lights.
This morning, I decided I would do a more in depth reading of the Bible. The only thing is that I left my Bible in our Suburban last night and I'm too afraid to go outside by myself in the dark.
Jesus subjected himself to this injustice for a reason. When Peter attempted to protect him with a clumsy swing of his sword, Jesus said to Peter, “Do you think I cannot call on my Father, and he will at once put at my disposal more than twelve legions of angels? (Matt. 26:53). But he did not call. He made himself vulnerable to the worst injustice in order to fulfill the Scriptures.
Last Tuesday, when Scott Olsen was brutalized by police for doing nothing, I got a bit emotional. Maybe even maternal. I care so much for this young man, who still can't talk and possibly faces brain surgery. It shut me down.
I just HAVE to post this!! We were cracking up and I need to remember this.
Some of you may be aware that for the past few months, a group calling itself The Write Agenda has been attempting to wage a disinformation campaign against Writer Beware and other anti-scam activists.
My favourite De Niro, whose performance is almost matched by James Woods. A sprawling tale of love, jealousy and betrayal, AMERICA is sometimes almost unbearably brutal and yet it's a film with almost unrivalled heart and soul. Do make sure a hankie is within reach.
I must say, I find all sorts of stuff I would never have the time, or be able, to find otherwise, including a lot of great recipes and food related stuff...and book related stuff..and photography related stuff...and Maine related stuff and fly fishing related stuff ...Ok, you get the idea.
Ellemenopee on October 19, 2011 at 2:38 pm said:
The World Beneath by Cate Kennedy (Grove/Atlantic, Inc)
Corn flour with water mixture
I'm no priss, okay? I can spray on the OFF and head out. But OFF doesn't work on those dang gnats. They just love to get in your ears, and all around your face, and basically make your life not nutty, but gnatty. And honestly? It's just annoying. Especially when you've been spoiled by the cushioning of the treadmill at the Y, by the friendly staff who greet you when you come in, by the ability to easily people watch through the glass windows lining 75% of the large work out room.
On a totally other note, I've been coughing, fever, chest heavy, blah blah blah for a week now! How ironic to be sick when the weather here is so warm and beautiful! It's not fair! Anyone else out there in the same situation?
LaPlante about a doctor with Alzheimer’s, had several people with varying degrees of Alzheimer’s in the audience - great questions! At another reading, someone blurted out a question while the author was in the middle of his opening. When he asked her, in the nicest way possible, to hang on for a bit and he would get back to her, the fan got up and walked out. Several times in the signing line, I’ve been manhandled by impatient fans. The last time was at Charles Frazier’s reading, and I barely missed being thrown to the floor by someone who said that since she had been the first one to the store that day, she should be the first in line. One night a woman in the back of a room crowded with hundreds of people asked if her son could get his book signed first because it was past his bedtime. It was 8:30 and the “boy” turned out to be 14 years old, but everyone was gracious and let him go first. He was humiliated and just kept saying, “I hate my mother.” People will ask you anything that pops into their heads, so be prepared to say no to some questions. Sometimes the audience has no questions at all, so have a story or two on hand to tell. Finally, most people do not go out on a work night in the driving rain to give you a hard time. They are there
Wow! CS6 can do amazing things with Camera Raw and the Content Aware feature. They've incorporated Premier-type video editing into the program which is great, but you better have a fairly recent computer to run it. That's a guess, I haven't checked the specs.
Police has since confirmed that one of the two detectives would appear in Papakura District Court on a disorderly behaviour charge. It’s further believed that he will apply for name suppression, and almost certainly be granted one.
praised the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council, and said judges are beginning to examine their pretrial and sentencing choices.
Anyway we finally got talking again and it was really nice, he invited me back to his however this time it was really late at night so I said that I had to be up in the morning and politely declined. He invited me round the next night and I agreed and said yes, this time when I went round things got slightly heated but I ended up ducking out before things went too far and wound up cuddling until I fell asleep.
Download Everything Pro is a very lite yet super powerful downloading utility that will let you search and download all the indexed mediafire files and 4shared files. It has all the classic features plus many new cool features and a graceful look too.
nice way to go and then we played War-cards. (It’s like) the normal version is
Tea reminds me of the days of running hashish through the mountains of Tibet. No, just kidding, never did that, won’t admit to it, forget i said that, but my love of tea started with this little antique tea pot months ago when I bought it for my best friend Donna who collects tea pots. I hope to finish the tea post in three, so bare with me as we follow this teapot and a few examples of some wonderful teas and a visit to the tea country in Malaysia.
rivers cannot sweep it away.
The Bacons are a mixed bunch, not all fully resolved but still haunting. Afterwards back home to talk and continuing the talk in the nearby Number Twenty-Four which does a very good celebratory meal. We are celebrating the visit.
If you win one of the challenges we sponsor, you could win 5 digital stamps of your choice from the Robyn's Fetish store.
The thought of a cocktail got me thinking about how to make one of my personal favourites the Cosmopolitan. Often berated for its Sex and the City status the Cosmo has in my mind come full circle out of the slightly creased corner of the cocktail bar menu and back into the limelight.
~Thomas Nagel
I am sure we will have to pay someone to help us move all of this stuff though, we aren’t young anymore and real wood is HEAVY!
She makes her entry by sending a warning letter to Teiichi about Yuuko, which means she definitely can see Yuuko. Believing her to be the ghost that snatches students, Kirie took it upon herself to educate Teiichi about what befalls him. Teiichi doesn’t believe it right off the bat, but it does leave a seed of doubt in him – “Did Yuuko lie?”
Mr Harrington said his wife had been the victim of “a public campaign of hatred when she was just doing her job”.
P~
During a recent press release, the Jacques Nicolet-led squad announced the formation of a new partnership with tyre supplier Dunlop and with it, unveiled plans to enter the LMP1 category. This agreement will see the OAK team, formerly the pseudo-development squad for Mazda Racing France, take on tyre development duties for the famous British supplier. As of 2011 OAK Racing will enter the premiere category of ACO prototype competition, while acting as the official LMP1 Dunlop tyre development squad.
32. Cat's Cradle: Kurt Vonnegut
–expending no energy. they move not. they d r i f t,
19. Do you prefer to shake hands or hug? It really depends on the situation, but I am a hugger.
I didn’t. Well, I had lots of ideas I planned out in my head of course; but you know how it goes when you have a long deadline? You keep putting it off until all of a sudden you’re staring the deadline down in a week and you’re like “Holy crap, is it really time to get to work?” Finally it’s the night before and you’re wondering if you’ll get anything worth reading posted at all and still get to bed before going to the day job the next morning. So I've decided to do a sorta free-write and see what bleh comes out. Hopefully its coherent by the end.
So I’m a bit late with this blog post. I came across the following piece from The Faery Inn well over a year ago, and decided I would use the idea myself. As much as I loved the idea, though, and as much of a “free post” as it seemed to be, when I went to get started on it, it proved more difficult than I anticipated, and I put it off a few times, until finally it just went on the shelf and started gathering dust. I was cleaning up some old posts early last month, and decided that April, National Poetry Month, would be the perfect time to bring it back out. And, again, I had other things I wanted to write first, and so it got pushed back toward the end of the month. And, then, I got busy, and didn’t post at all the last few days of April, and now I’m doing my Month After National Poetry Month post. Oh well.
This is local oysters, smoked in the back yard. Ate 'em about an hour ago.
For real, she does and it’s addictive. She is the real reason I gained 15 pounds last year.
Thus we had the situation in the Queensland State election recently where the Labor Party, which was in government, was punished by the voters and today holds only 7 out of 89 seats. They had done a bad job, and a lot of their “core” voters chose the Opposition. To the point where the vastly diminished Queensland Labor Party probably cannot function properly as an Opposition in the State parliament. In other words, there are hardly any “core” Labor voters in Australia anymore – very few people whose loyalty is unquestionable.
I am mindful but not obsessive as a parent.
because you truly believe you have found what you have been seeking
Cheese: Aged Gouda, strong Cheddar
By Drew Gibson
And then a thought struck me! Rita has a habit of writing things on any old piece of paper and keeping them all in an unsorted mass; sometimes bundled by a rubber band.
I decided to up the ante. ‘When I go I’d like to be liquidized and drank at the reception. I could ask my kids to mix in some Imodium so that I am literally a pain in everyone’s arse.’
Confessions will be heard through Mass from 6pm by Fr Leon Pereira, OP. Absolution will be given using the traditional Latin form.
William Edward Collins argues in his introduction to The Church Historical Society’s 1899 edition of The Canons of 1571 in English and Latin that the canons derive their authority from the bishops in synod and not from the advice and consent of the clergy. In any event the Canons never received the royal assent and consequently they possessed no legal force. While the Canons were thus lacking legal validity, they were accepted as authoritative in the Province of Canterbury and were acted upon in the dioceses of the Southern province.
I need to sit down with an old friend. Someone who has far more interesting things going on in their life – who can take my mind out of whatever funk I’ve tossed myself into — someone who has no idea whats been going on in my life lately. Who knows…
-Jersey Cotton
Characters without flaw are flat and the stories told about them can’t draw the readers’ interest the same way stories about imperfect characters can. What surprise is there when a perfect character defeats his enemy? Doesn’t he always defeat his enemy? Was there any doubt that he’d win again?
“I went to her office and told her I wanted to buy the milk. I paid her the R150. No questions were asked and within five minutes I got it.”
But I digress…..
Thomas Mortensen(1984) has been a DJ for several years. At the age of 16 he really started his interest in the Harder Styles of music. Always focused on the higher amount of BPM, and how to play power-full tracks the right way, and with the right attitude. You are always sure to see the passion and love of the music when Unifite is on stage!
Stops to exist? Oh, aphasia. You make me sound so smart. Ceases. It ceases to exist.
His vocabulary is expanding and I've been keeping a chart of all of his words. Some new additions are "nana" for banana, "hot," and "peeeeeese!" for please. He seems to have a pretty good vocabulary for a little guy, and it's a lot of fun to know that he understands much of what we say to him as well. His signs are coming along, though he is more likely to just say the word or grunt and point than use the signs like he used to.
My husband and I are big history nerds. We love to visit local historical societies as well as sites of national significance. It hasn’t been easy on our pocketbook, though, since most of these places charge an admission fee. We’ve paid a variety of prices – from a goodwill donation to upwards of $30 a person at Chicago’s Field Museum. In this post, I will share how we’ve saved money on museum admission, nationwide, through the Time Travelers program.
The album closes with perhaps the most ambitious work they’ve done to date. A four song suite: ‘Stalagmites’/ ‘Like A Gift Giver’/ ‘Butterflies’/ ‘Arena Rock Encore with Full Cast’ was recorded at London’s Abbey Road and self produced. “We’ve always been Beatles fans” says Ross “and there was a sense of liberty taking, it’s our fifth record, let’s go to Abbey Road and record! Why not?”
“I see your point.” She stiffened. “So you’re saying you don’t believe in fortunes or prophecy?”
Jurors heard that Girl A even forced her 13-year-sister into having sex with the men.
Six months ago, I participated in the Spark Blogfest, and wrote about what gave me the spark to write. I had a blast! A big part of that was because it was SO MUCH FUN to read everyone's Spark stories. (So I'm really hoping that a lot of you are posting your story today!)
General Robert Magnus, USMC (Ret.)
I started the mountains by coloring with B41. I stroke from the top of each peak, down to the base, flowing in the direction of the mountain. I am lifting up at the end of each stroke so that I have less ink at the base and more at the peak. As you can see from the third peak, I apply lots of very light layers to achieve the look I'm going for. I did criss-cross my strokes slightly for a proper feather, but I am consistent with the base feathered and the top of the peak dark.
Oh, sweet Jesus. One of my students recommended a "study aid" called No-Fear Shakespeare to the class. It's a sort of facing-page "translation" of Shakespeare into modern English. (Yes, I know Shakespeare is already in modern English.) I said very quickly that I didn't endorse the recommendation, but I felt like I owed them a fuller explanation of why not, so I've been poking around on the NFS web site for examples of lines that lose a great deal in translation. For your delectation, here are some of my favorites so far.
This little guy was one of so many kids that fell in love with our rocking horse (I bought this a few years ago,one for Miss Abigail, and I guess one for a spare), I actually had agreed to sell it at the end of the show , but I think most folks that said they wanted it were long gone by then , almost wish I had more of them , it was a pretty popular item!LOL Oh well, I like it and there are lots of little ones in my life who will enjoy it
So thank you from the bottom of my bottom to Vanilla, Bee, Aerin and Whirl for your kindnesss, generosity and all round loveliness in giving me these awards. And thank you too to all my visitors who come by even though I'm very stop-starty these days. I pass these on, in gratitude, to you.
Upcoming/no progress:
I so love the comments you left on my last post. Today I want to talk about the double standard when it comes to the notion that "sex sells" and why we see so many half-to-mostly naked women in advertisements and selling things in real life and hardly any seductive men.
I am grateful for her nimble little fingers, skilled enough to undo onesie snaps and diaper tabs. I am grateful for her artistic sensibilities, with careful, deliberate poo placement ensuing that no crib bar was left out of Poo Party 2011.
G. Pascal Zachary is a professor of practice at the Consortium for Science Policy & Outcomes at Arizona State University. He is the author of Showstopper!: The Breakneck Pace to Create Windows NT and the Next Generation at Microsoft (The Free Press, 1994), on the making of a Microsoft Windows program, and Endless Frontier: Vannevar Bush, Engineer of the American Century (MIT Press, 1999), which received IEEE’s first literary award. Zachary reported on Silicon Valley for The Wall Street Journal in the 1990s; for The New York Times, he launched the Ping column on innovation in 2007. The Scientific Estate is made possible through the support of Arizona State University and IEEE Spectrum.
For now we are living in a Residence Inn. Now there are some perks to living in a hotel.
I'll try to snap some pictures of her this weekend, it
How timely that I should get this little note from JK Bradley this morning:
I particularly like bringing my kids to this library because of its intimate, child-focused environment and find that my children enjoy it more than other larger libraries. I have also found that watching my children play with the different toys provides me with great opportunity to introduce new books related to their play.
Finish: Short on timber, pepper, grapefruit, malt.
With invitations finally in the mail & RSVPs coming in, all the final details were caching up to me: table signs, placecards, favors, hotel baskets, dresses & shoes for the girls, my dress fittings, makeup & hair trials, and another mailing to my guests.
My oldest son writes just like I did. He struggles mightily to lay down legible sentences.
Tories apparently value traditions - unless there's money to be made it seems. Why else would they be in favour of selling off the nations forests? Forests that have belonged to the nation since the 1500's? They say they will favour charities or community groups but these organisations as a rule do not have the funds to buy them. They'll end up in private hands or worse, go to the timber companies.
At the moment I do not want to think about seeing the doctor or the dentist or the optometrist. Within the next couple of months I ought to see all these people. Just now I only want to rest and get better.
He's the king of the whole wide world
With that tactical strike, the Empire began to lose its control over its own homeland: the Mighty State of Texas. The following year, the barbarians struck again, toppling the Empire in their own Coliseum. The weeping and gnashing of teeth was widespread in the imperial city. BurntOrange was deemed a color of bondage and defeat, while maroon saw a new currency among the masses. The child-soldiers suffered greatly at the hands of the formerly subjugated barbarians. The symbols of the empire were used as symbols of defecation, weakness and sordid living.
Remove from oven and layer the biscuits on top. Sprinkle with a little seasoning and return to oven uncovered for 15-20 minutes or until the biscuits are browned.
I wanted to encourage them and you, if you're in a place where you need it.
RIP Wil.
Pure Luck
Zachariah was the one who first named me “The Magical Princess of Love.” He would tell people that he loved me and thought I grew more beautiful every day. Yet I always knew that I was safe with Zachariah, that there would be no sex or commitments, only a remarkable intertwining of our souls. He wrote many stories and poems in my honor and brought me gifts for every occasion he could think of. One day, he gave me a tiny bottle of rose oil, and said, “Happy un-birthday, magical princess!”
And let me just say.....HO, HO, HOLEY SMOKES!!!! The holiday catalog is 44 pages of pure papercrafting goodness!! There are 32 new holiday sets - I'm talking Christmas, Halloween, Thanksgiving, winter, fall, and Valentines. We have 2 new colors - wasabi & pebble - offered in our fabulous cardstock, ink, and satin ribbons. MY FAVORITES in the catalog have to be all of the dies - oh mylanta!!! There's new patterned cardstock, felt, baker's twine, fun embellishments, and much more. You've gotta check it out!
Speaking on the phone this morning, Joanna Lumley said “Look, this is difficult stuff, be under no illusions about that. But I think I can get it across. Let’s do a thought experiment. Imagine you go clothes shopping, ok? Perhaps to buy a nice suit, or dress. You’ve worn it, you’ve made use of it, and you decide that in all probability, you probably won’t be trying it on again.”
I make a habit of going on there at least once a day. I buy quite often. I'll start posting up things that I buy too! Let you know what I think of them.
Life is a beauty, admire it.
B is for Beer of choice: I have only found one beer that I like: Leinenkugal's Honey Wheat
4 efforts
In Twitter’s blog post, vice president of engineering Adam Messinger says the company has begun to “reach out to other companies to discuss the IPA and whether it might make sense to them, too.” Twitter also posted a draft of the agreement online for everyone to view.
Saturday morning I went to the Silk Farm. It is about 10 km outside Siem Reap city down National Road 6, which is also the road to the airport. I went by tuk tuk, which was wild. Imagine sitting in a covered cart pulled by a motorbike (with the speed of a Vespa) along the M25 or US Route I-95. It was exactly like that. But I wasn't the slowest thing on the road. We passed adults on bicycles, children going home from school on bicycles, or children walking. Some of them were clearly no older than 6. Imagine we Westerners sending our kids to walk to and from school along the highway....but I was clearly the only one concerned.
Twitter @ErikVenskus
Me: And the last time we did that?
That’s when I hear a rapid fire bark. I look over and sure enough there’s Dash. Barking and charging.
Along with my success, I did have a couple of areas that need improvement. But…I have solutions for next time.
A TIME FOR HOPE
Beer A for me had a broad, sweet, fruity aroma, I want to say lychees, but that sounds pretentious. Bubble gum, with aged red apples. The flavour is really candy-like, with pear drops and an amplified juicyfruit chewing gum and banana. Very sweet and sticky though.
Forever gone
Many tales are told of the Syldoon Empire and its fearsome soldiers, who are known throughout the world for their treachery and atrocities. Some say that the Syldoon eat virgins and babies–or perhaps their own mothers. Arkamondos, a bookish young scribe, suspects that the Syldoon’s dire reputation may have grown in the retelling, but he’s about to find out for himself.
"Just thinking."
I’d rather face a dozen lethal assassins any night than deal with something as tricky, convoluted, and fragile as my feelings.
Here’s a film that came out in November of 2010, directed by Philip and Chris LeClerc, that presents a look into the startling problems of many youth ministries and programs in America. Many churches have lapsed into carnal-driven means to attract (carnal) youth (and carnal men and women at large). As Paul Washer, who is interviewed in this video, has rightly pointed out, what you attract them with is what you must keep them with. What this has led to is youth ministries and churches full of unconverted children, men, and women.
But it is not natural. It is not inevitable. It is not "self-evident." In fact, if you look at the history of civilization, what you see is a glaring lack of liberty and equality all over the world and as far back as we have historical records. And unless those liberties and equalities are protected and defended, they will be lost. Really.
Matt Smith, a 27-year-old Englishman, has taken over as the 11th Doctor.
“Not really my responsibility, but as much as I can, I will try to be responsible that whatever I do sets the right example in front of young girls,” the 23-year-old said journalists while unveiling the Inaugural cover of India Today Women Health Magazine.
brighter than its been before
Europe-Ecology-the Greens (EELV) candidate Eva Joly won 2 percent, New Anti-capitalist Party (NPA) candidate Philippe Poutou won 1 percent and Workers Struggle (LO) candidate Nathalie Arthaud won 0.6 percent of the vote.
Article 17 An agriculture administrative department of the people’s government at the county level or above shall take measures to intensify the scientific research, technology popularization and publicity and training regarding the recovery and administration of polluted places of origin.
This book is a follow up of the general’s other book “Die wat gewen het” (Those who have won) or as it appeared in English “At the Front” (2009).
Let me preface this post by clearly stating that I am NOT one to say cruel or unkind things about someone’s level of attractiveness, height or other physical characteristics they can’t change because that would be just plain mean. However, I’m sure we’d all agree that there ARE plenty of things that a person can change when it comes to their overall appearance – things like grooming, hairstyle, and choice of clothing.
Food is so important in the social life of humankind,we desire it, grow it, cook it and it sustains us. Sitting eating around a table or campfire is elemental! Our lives are witnessed and stories told and retold, it is not just cooking it is an art and a comfort.
I know. I know. It is not the official beta and it ain't over til that horrible phone call. But I wanted to see my double lines TODAY. I wanted to know my children were growing in my womb. I wanted tangible proof.
Who refuses to knuckle under.
You all are wonderfully supportive and I could not be more grateful.
Under girding all this is always the desire to know and follow God’s direction. Confidence of being in His will provides the faith to keep moving forward even in the face of major changes. Almost eight months later now, hind sight has given assurance of right decisions. The transition will continue for a while, but God’s guidance will be there always.
It takes courage. It takes trust. It takes work. But, OH, the FUN! If you aren’t a runner now, you don’t have any idea!
It is so comfortable to say racism is the cause
Are beets in season? I honestly don't know the lifecycle of this glorious orb. But I can tell you how to cook them. Bonk them, unpeeled, into a small covered casserole dish with a tiny puddle of water, and roast for an hour. Take them out and plunge into a bowl of cold water (in the sink), where you can easily massage the skins off.
Instead of a rat race attacker.
Watch the preview for next weeks episode below!
In the category of bad mothers, we have to start with Mayzie from Dr. Seuss's HORTON HATCHES THE EGG. When Mayzie takes a break from nesting, she toddles of to Palm Beach!
this blog temporarily just for fanfic
Ok, I will not comment further on this, since Penn & Teller made a pretty good case. Though, I do have a humble request: would you fucking people stop with all this "corporations are evil" shit?! Surely, they're all hellbent on acquiring as much money as they can as soon as possible, but what the heck? We all kind of need money and it's a darwinistic race for survival, and besides: not all corporations are called Apple!
- Super Junior Member
I hear a pundit is also part of your travel entourage….you preparing for the afterlife on every trip too?
- Bluetooth Serial module
In the past few weeks I have been busy buying for the next run of fairs. These large wooden spools from France have been selling well, and they look great displayed on some of my Antique and recycled Indian painted furniture.
A striking feature of the Libya war is the way it has mobilized behind it a social-political layer of middle class ex-lefts, liberal academics and former protesters. This is a process that has been developing over the course of several decades, accelerated by the demoralization of a section of this layer whose “leftism” leaned heavily on the Soviet Stalinist bureaucracy and began to dissipate with the bureaucracy’s self-liquidation. Others rallied to the imperialist intervention in the Balkans, attracted then, as now, to the phony claims that the world’s greatest aggressors were waging a war for “human rights.”
So yesterday was our Ward's (church congregation) Christmas Party. The decorations were FABULOUS!!! Brooke (the one in charge) really went all out - SO festive. Way to go, Brooke!!! Our theme was "A Whooville Holiday". From, The Grinch. I just LOVE those greens and reds together. That almost lime green is SO cool!
For the Father up above is looking down in love
Although the sale by Derek Quinlan of a car park on South Audley Street in London’s Mayfair stalled at the end of last year, it seems that NAMA has had more success just around the corner at 20, Grosvenor Square which according to sources has sold for GBP £250m (€295m). The seller is understood to be a consortium led by Richard Caring, the 62-year old British rag-trade to restaurant-venue millionaire behind celebrity restaurants such as The Ivy and Le Caprice in London, the mid-market Strada and Belgo chains as well as Harry’s Bar and Annabel’s nightclub not to mention Wentworth Golf Club. And if you’ve ever been to Carluccio’s on Dawson Street in Dublin, you can ponder the fact that 12% of the operation is owned by Richard Caring, or at least it was until the end of last year when Dubai-based retail and restaurant investment company, Landmark Group bought the chain.
Now it's time to talk challenges. We loved your projects for the Spring challenge. Random generator came up with KARISSA's name. Congrats, Karissa! Grab the winner's badge, and we will let Melissa know that you won the March Blog challenge.
That history was not apparent at the time although the end of an era would be signalled fully with the retirement of Joe Mercer being announced barely thirty minutes after the trophy had been lifted.
2 birds have tested positive for the West Nile Virus in Wisconsin. Now you know the origin of Angry Birds.
Last workshop had sixty-seven people. It was Jan Harris moderating, the panel was Erin Grady from our sister chapter Desert Rose in Phoenix, my critique partner Jackie Tresler, who writes as Jackie James, and Michael Bennis in our chapter. They talked about the desire to be an author.
We have just finished reading Physics of the Impossible by Michio Kaku and he mentions Contact and Carl Sagan who wrote the book that Contact was based on, so it was a good way of tying in physics, astronomy, and fiction, all in one fell swoop.
And at his elbow, Souter Johnny,
Oh the blackness is murderous
Special Agent Lucas Avery has dealt with some tricky puzzles in his time, but this is stranger than anything he’s ever encountered. His one lead is a pair of names: ‘Gwen’ and ‘Rhys’...
So we were only 4, but we enjoyed the party!
juice from 1/2 lime
Last year, I didn't even think about running, walking, or even exercising as we started 2009. So to set goals is a whole new thing for me.
1 medium onion, chopped (1/2 cup)
Posting photos soon so you too may admire is adorabilitousitude.
When 9:25 hit we were in the car and headed to Canter’s. The drive took 20 minutes. We parked, walked along Fairfax in the bright spring sun and then went into Canter’s. A glass case beaming with pastries greeted us, everything from hamantaschen with jam fillings, rugelach, black-and-white cookies, and apple strudel. All I know is that if sweet dough is your thing, you’ll be very content here.
We've been planning this big Oktoberfest party for over a year. Late last summer we had a long meandering conversation about having a big party in our backyard with beer and sausages on the grill and how we could finally use our outdoor firepit and how wonderful it would be to celebrate our favorite month, October. This party has been in the back of my mind since then. It's been really really big, and then a little more manageable, and now it is almost here. I'm very excited.
